Jacob Bundsgaard is the leader of Aarhus.
The runway length of Aarhus Airport is 2702.0.
Adirondack Regional Airport is 507 metres above sea level.
Adirondack Regional Airport is located in Harrietstown, New York.
Adolfo Suárez Madrid–Barajas Airport is located in San Sebastian de los
The runway name of Adolfo Suarez Madrid–Barajas Airport is 14L/32
The runway name of Adolfo Suarez Madrid–Barajas Airport is 14R/32
Afonso Pena International Airport is operated by Infraero.
Agra Airport is located in Agra.
Al Taqaddum Air Base is 84 metres above sea level.
Alderney Airport serves the city of Alderney.
The runway name of Allama Iqbal International Airport is 18R/36L.
The runway length of Alpena County Regional Airport is 1533.0.
The runway name of Alpena County Regional Airport is 1/19.
Amsterdam Airport Schiphol serves the city of Amsterdam.
Andrews County is the county seat of Andrews County, Texas.
Andrews County Airport serves the city of Andrews, Texas.
The runway name of Andrews County Airport is 11/29.
The runway name of Andrews County Airport is Helipad.
Angola International Airport serves the city of Luanda.
Ardmore Airport is located in Auckland, New Zealand.
Athens's mayor is Giorgos Kaminis.
Athens International Airport is located in Spata.
German is the language spoken in Belgium.
Philippe of Belgium is the leader of Belgium.
Copenhagen is the capital of Denmark.
Lars Lokke Rasmussen is the leader of Denmark.
The Flemish Region is led by the Flemish Government.
Greek is the language spoken in Greece.
Nikos Voutsis is the leader of Greece.
Harrietstown, New York is part of the United States.
Anwar Zaheer Jamali is the leader of Pakistan.
Paracuellos de Jarama is part of the Community of Madrid.
The Port Authority of New York and New Jersey's headquarters are the Four World
San Sebastian de los Reyes is located in Spain.
Saranac Lake, New York is part of the United States.
Stephen Dilts is the Chief of South Jersey Transportation Authority.
Aaron Bertram began his career in 1998.
Aaron Deer is associated with The Horns of Happiness.
Aaron Turner performs avant-garde metal music.
Aaron Turner performs black metal music.
Aaron Turner is from Boston.
Abradab is associated with the rapper Magik.
Abradab is a solo singer.
Ace Wilder was born on 23rd July 1982.
Ace Wilder's record label is EMI Records.
Agustin Barboza is signed to the record label Philips Records.
Alan Frew is associated with Glass Tiger.
Albennie Jones was born in Errata, Mississippi.
Aleksandra Kovac is associated with Kornelije Kovac.
Aleksandra Kovac is a solo singer.
Aleksandra Kovac performs soul music.
Alfred Garth Jones died in London.
Alfredo Zitarrosa is associated with Hilario Perez.
Alfredo Zitarrosa performs Milonga music.
Alfredo Zitarrosa's record label is Movieplay.
Alison O'Donnell started performing in 1963.
Allen Forrest performs pop music.
Anders Osborne's record label is Alligator Records.
Anders Osborne's record label is Shanachie Records.
Andrew Rayel is associated with Jwaydan Moyine.
Andrew Rayel was born in Chisinau, Moldova.
Andrew White performs alternative rock music.
Asuncion is part of Gran Asunción.
Deram Records is located in London.
Afrobeat is a fusion genre of Funk.
Gangsta rap is a sub genre of hip hop music.
Jazz originated from blues music.
RCA Records is distributed by Legacy Recordings.
The band Twilight performs black metal music.
The demonym of the United Kingdom is British people.
Alan Shepard was awarded the Distinguished Service Medal by the United States Navy.
Alan Shepard died in California.
William Anders was the backup pilot of Apollo 11.
The Apollo 14 operated by NASA.
The Apollo 8 operated by NASA.
Buzz Aldrin is from the United States.
Elliot See was a test pilot.
The University of Texas at Austin is affiliated to the University of Texas System.
Hookem is a mascot at the University of Texas in Austin.
A.C. Milan's chairman is Silvio Berlusconi.
Aaron Boogaard was born in Canada.
Abel Hernandez plays for the Uruguay Olympic football team.
Abel Hernandez plays for the Uruguay national football team.
Abner plays for C.D. FAS.
Adam Maher was born in Ait Ikkou, Morocco.
Adam Maher was born in Diemen.
Adam McQuaid was born in Charlottetown.
Ahmad Kadhim Assad was born in Iraq.
Ahmad Kadhim Assad plays for PAS Tehran FC.
Akeem Ayers is a linebacker.
Akeem Priestley plays for FK Mughan.
Akeem Priestley plays for the Jacksonville Dolphins youth team.
Al-Khor Sports Club play in the Qatar Stars League.
Alaa Abdul Zahra was born in Baghdad.
Alan Martin plays for Accrington Stanley F.C.
Alan Martin plays for Crewe Alexandra F.C.
Aleksander Barkov Jr was born in Finland.
Aleksander Barkov Jr. plays for the Florida Panthers.
Aleksander Barkov Jr. plays in the National Hockey League.
Aleksandre Guruli plays for FC Samtredia.
Alex Plante was born in Manitoba.
Alex Plante is 1.9304 m tall.
Drew Caldwell is the leader of Brandon, Manitoba.
Budapest is located in Hungary.
Inuktitut is the language spoken in Canada.
The Columbus Blue Jackets are located in Columbus, Ohio.
FC Terek Grozny's ground is in Grozny.
FC Tom Tomsk play in the Russian Football National League.
The manager of FC Torpedo Moscow is Valery Petrakov.
Dale Tallon is the general manager of the Florida Panthers.
The coach of Maccabi Tel Aviv BC is Žan Tabak.
The ground of Olympique Lyonnais is the Parc Olympique Lyonnais.
The manager of Penarol is Jorge Orosman da Silva.
Point Fortin is located in Trinidad.
The architect of 103 Colmore Row is John Madin.
103 Colmore Row is located at Colmore Row.
11 Diagonal Street was completed in 1983.
200 Public Square was completed in 1985.
20 Fenchurch Street was completed in January 2009.
20 Fenchurch Street is located in the United Kingdom.
300 North LaSalle has 60 floors.
The architect of 3Arena is HOK SVE.
The 3Arena is located at East Link Bridge.
The building of Adare Manor was started in 1700.
Adare Manor is located in the Republic of Ireland.
The Akita Museum of Art was inaugurated on the 28th of September 2013.
The current tenants of Alan B Miller Hall are the Mason School of Business.
The architect of Amdavad ni Gufa is B.V. Doshi.
Ampara Hospital is located in Sri Lanka.
Asher and Mary Isabelle Richardson House was added to the National Register of Historic
The Asser Levy Public Baths were constructed in 1904.
Birmingham's postal code is B.
Chicago is part of DuPage County, Illinois.
Dublin is located in the Republic of Ireland.
Dublin is part of Leinster.
Sumitra Mahajan is the leader of India.
The Brazilians are an ethnic group in Japan.
Tarō Asō is the leader of Japan.
Bill Marriott is the key person of Marriott International.
English is the language spoken in the Republic of Ireland.
The capital of South Africa is Cape Town.
London is the capital of the United Kingdom.
Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States where Native Americans
Paul Ryan is the leader of the United States.
Carl A Wirtanen discovered (29075) 1950 DA.
(410777) 2009 FD has an apoapsis of 259776702.47055 kilometres.
The epoch of (66063) 1998 RO1 is 2013-11-04.
The periapsis of (66391) 1999 KW4 is 29919600000.0.
101 Helena has a mass of 3.0 kilograms.
101 Helena has an orbital period of 1516.6700000000003 days.
1036 Ganymed has an average speed of 16.86 km per sec.
1036 Ganymed has a temperature of 160.0 kelvins.
F Vilas discovered 107 Camilla.
N.R. Pogson discovered 107 Camilla.
The escape velocity of 1089 Tama is 0.0068 km per sec.
1097 Vicia has a rotation period of 95040.0.
The escape velocity of 1099 Figneria is 0.0155 km per sec.
1099 Figneria has a mass of 2.7 kilograms.
109 Felicitas has a periapsis of 283326000000.0.
109 Felicitas has a temperature of 170.0 kelvins.
10 Hygiea has an orbital period of 5.57 days.
The periapsis of 1101 Clematis is 445895000000.0.
110 Lydia has an epoch date of December 31st 2006.
110 Lydia has a periapsis of 377016000000.0.
N.R. Pogson is a national of England.
The area code of Abilene, Texas is 325.
Abilene is part of Texas.
The leader of Albany, Georgia is the Mayor.
Albany, Oregon has a total area of 45.97 square kilometres.
Albany, Oregon is located in the United States.
The leader of Albuquerque, New Mexico is the State Senate.
Albuquerque, New Mexico is led by the Albuquerque City Council.
Amarillo, Texas is located in the United States.
Amarillo is part of Potter County, Texas.
Amarillo, Texas is part of the United States.
The area code of Anaheim, California is 657.
Anderson, Indiana is part of Adams Fall Creek, Lafayette, Richland, Union.
Angola is part of Pleasant Township, Steuben County, Indiana.
The city Administrator is the leader of Ann Arbor, Michigan.
The leader of Ann Arbor, Michigan is the Mayor.
Ann Arbor, Michigan has a population density of 1580.7 inhabitants per square
Antioch, California is 13 metres above sea level.
The Californias 11th State Assembly District leads Antioch, California.
The elevation of Arlington, Texas is 184.0 above sea level.
Atlantic County, New Jersey is located in the United States.
Attica is part of Fountain County, Indiana.
Auburn is part of Alabama.
California is located in the United States.
Atlanta is the largest city in Fulton County, Georgia.
Georgia is located in the United States.
The capital of Indiana is Indianapolis.
Lee County is located in Alabama.
The capital of New Jersey is Trenton.
Potter County is located in Texas.
Tarrant County, Texas is located in the United States.
Ann Arbor is the largest city in Washtenaw County, Michigan.
The comic character Asterix was created by Rene Goscinny.
The comic character Auron was created by Marv Wolfman.
The comic character Balder was created by Jack Kirby.
Bananaman was broadcast by STV.
Bananaman first aired on the 3rd of October 1983.
Bill Oddie starred in Bananaman.
Baymax is a character in the film Big Hero 6.
Bill Everett was awarded the Eisner Award.
Bill Oddie's child is Kate Hardie.
The comic character Bolt was created by Dan Mishkin.
Bozo the Iron Man's full name is Hugh Hazzard.
John Buscema was awarded the Eagle Award.
Marv Wolfman was awarded the Eagle Award.
Ajoblanco is also known as Ajo blanco.
The main ingredients of Ajoblanco are bread, almonds, garlic, water and
Arem arem is a food found nationwide in Indonesia but more specific to Java.
Arem arem is a food found in Indonesia.
The main ingredients of Arrabbiata sauce are Tomatoes, red chili, gar
Cuttlefish is an ingredient in Arròs negre.
Squid is an ingredient in Arròs negre.
Asam pedas comes from Malaysia.
Avocado is from the genus Persea.
Ayam penyet is served hot.
Baked Alaska is a dessert.
Frangipane is an ingredient in Bakewell tart.
Noodles are an ingredient in Bakso.
Vermicelli is an ingredient in Bakso.
Chorizo is an ingredient in Bandeja paisa.
Barny cakes were created by Mondelez International.
Barny cakes can be varied by chocolate.
Barny cakes contain 1.8 g protein.
Batchoy comes from the Philippines.
Batchoy contains chicken.
Batchoy contains vegetables.
Binignit is a dish from the Visayas region.
Patrick McLoughlin is the leader of Derbyshire Dales.
Cake is a variation of dessert.
Ice cream is a dessert.
Jusuf Kalla is the leader of Indonesia.
Italians live in Italy.
Baduy is an ethnic group in Java.
Lemon is a member of the order Rosids.
Mexicans live in Mexico.
Spanish is spoken in Mexico.
Arabic is spoken in the Philippines.
Shumai is a variation of Siomay.
The 1955 Dodge is also known as the Dodge Coronet.
The 1955 Dodge has a 230 cubic inches engine.
The AIDA Cruises are located in Rostock.
The AIDAluna began her career on 22nd March 2009.
The AIDAluna is a Sphinx class cruise ship.
The AIDAstella was built by Meyer Werft.
The christening date of AIDAstella is March 16th 2013.
The AIDAstella was in service on March 17th 2013.
The ALCO RS-3 has a four-stroke engine.
The ALV X-1 was manufactured by Alliant Techsystems.
The AMC Matador and the AMC Ambassador are related means of transport.
The Abarth 1000 GT Coupé was produced in 1958.
The Acura TLX has a 3.5 litre engine.
The Acura TLX has a Honda K engine.
The Acura TLX has a 9 speed ZF 9HP automatic (V6) transmission
The Alfa Romeo 164 is a Executive car.
The Alfa Romeo 164 and the Fiat Croma are similar means of transport.
Alhambra had its maiden voyage on July 7th 1855.
The Alhambra has a ship beam of 8.3m.
The Alhambra has a top speed of 18.52.
The Antares rocket had its final flight on the 28th of October 2014.
The Ariane 5 had its maiden flight on August 11th 2005.
The Ariane 5 was manufactured by Airbus Defence and Space.
Atlas II originates from the United States.
The Atlas II final flight was on March 16th 1998.
Audi is a division of Audi e-tron.
The Audi A1 is assembled in Audi Brussels.
Caterpillar Inc. was founded in California.
Douglas R Oberhelman is a key person at Caterpillar Inc.
Caterpillar Inc. is located in Peoria, Illinois.
The Delta II was launched from Cape Canaveral Air Force Station.
Sami languages are spoken in Finland.
Stanislaw Tillich is the leader of Germany.
The Guiana Space Centre's headquarters are in Kourou, French Guiana.
Acura is the division of Honda.
The Lancia Thema and the Alfa Romeo 164 are similar means of transport.
Meyer Werft is located in Germany.
Meyer Werft is located in Papenburg.
The Atatürk Monument was designed by Pietro Canonica.
The bronze Ataturk Monument is made of bronze.
Artur Rasizade is the leader of Azerbaijan.
The Baku Turkish Martyrs' Memorial is located in Azerbaijan.
The Baku Turkish Martyrs' Memorial is made of red granite and white 
Aaron S Daggett was awarded the Purple Heart.
Aaron S Daggett fought in the Battle of Mine Run.
Abdul Rahman Ya'kub was in office while Tuanku Bujang Tuanku Othman
Abdul Taib Mahmud's alma mater is the University of Adelaide.
Abdul Taib Mahmud's region is Kota Samarahan.
Abdul Taib Mahmud was succeeded by Adenan Satem.
Abdul Taib Mahmud was succeeded by Sulaiman Abdul Rahman Taib.
Abdulsalami Abubakar was a member of the Nigerian Army.
Abel Caballero was in office while Juan Carlos I of Spain was Monarch.
Abner W. Sibal fought in World War II.
Abraham A Ribicoff was succeeded by Anthony J. Celebrezze.
Adam Koc was awarded the Cross of Valour in Poland.
Adam Koc died in New York City.
Adenan Satem graduated from the University of Adelaide.
Adonis Georgiadis worked as the Deputy Minister for Development, Competitiveness and
Agnes Kant worked at the House of Representatives in Netherlands.
Agnes Kant resides in the Netherlands.
Airey Neave was awarded the Territorial Decoration.
Airey Neave was born in Knightsbridge, London.
Airey Neave started service in 1935.
Alberto Teisaire is a national of Argentina.
Alfred Moore Scales fought in the Battle of Chancellorsville.
Alfred Moore Scales fought in the Overland Campaign.
Allan Shivers fought in World War II.
Allan Shivers served in the United States Army.
Alvah Sabin ended his career on March 3rd 1857.
Alvah Sabin was a member of the Whig Party in the United States.
Antonis Samaras was succeeded by Konstantinos Mitsotakis.
Gabriela Michetti is the leader of Argentina.
Austrian German is the language spoken in Austria.
The Battle of Fredericksburg was part of the American Civil War.
Edmund J. Davis died in Austin, Texas.
The alma mater of Josef Klaus is the University of Vienna.
Juan Peron is a member of the Labour Party in Argentina.
Mike Akhigbe's predecessor was Oladipo Diya.
Sadique Abubakar was a commander in the Nigerian Air Force.
The Romani people are an ethnic group in Poland.
The Kashubian language is spoken in Poland.
Peter Stoger is the manager of 1. FC Koln.
1 FC Magdeburg played in the 2014 season.
A.C. Lumezzane played in the 2014-15 Lega Pro season.
A.D. Isidro Metapan's full name is Asociacion Deportiva.
The full name of A.E Dimitra Efxeinoupolis is A.E Dimitra
A.E Dimitra Efxeinoupolis played in the 2014 season.
A.E Dimitra Efxeinoupolis played in the 2014-15 A EPSTH,
A.F.C. Blackpool has 1500 members.
The ground of A.F.C. Fylde is The Fylde.
A.S. Gubbio 1910's ground is in Italy.
A.S. Livorno Calcio has 19238 members.
A.S. Roma played in the 2014-15 Serie A season.
Frank de Boer is the manager of AFC Ajax.
The nickname of AFC Ajax (amateurs) is Joden , Goden
The AFC Ajax (amateurs) has 5000 members.
AZAL PFK is located in Shuvalan, Baku, Azerbaijan.
AZ Alkmaar has 17023 members.
The manager of Agremiação Sportiva Arapiraquense is Vica.
Agremiação Sportiva Arapiraquense played in the 2015 Campeonato Brasileiro
Akron Summit Assault's ground is St Vincent-St Mary High School.
Akron Summit Assault has 3000 members.
Amsterdam is part of Amsterdam-Centrum.
Nikos Voutsis is the leader of Greece.
Gus Poyet plays for AEK Athens FC.
Jens Härtel plays for SV Germania Schoneiche.
John van den Brom plays for AZ Alkmaar.
Jorge Humberto Rodriguez plays for A.D. Isidro Metapán.
Massimo Drago plays for Delfino Pescara 1936.
Massimo Drago plays for S.S. Chieti Calcio.
The Olympic Stadium is located in Marousi.
The Premier Development League champions are K-W United FC.
Stuart Parker plays for Bury FC.
The Accademia di Architettura di Mendrisio has 100 academic staff.
In Soldevanahalli, Acharya Dr. Sarvapalli Radhakrishnan Road, Hess
Alba Iulia is located in Romania.
Alba Iulia is part of Alba County.
The patron saint of Romania is Andrew the Apostle.
The School of Business and Social Sciences at the Aarhus University has 737 academic staff.
The School of Business and Social Sciences at the Aarhus University is located in Denmark.
Eric Flint is the author of 1634: The Bavarian Crisis.
1634: The Bavarian Crisis was preceded by The Grantville Gazettes.
1634: The Ram Rebellion was followed by 1635: The Cantin Law.
AIP Advances has the EISSN number 2158.
A Fortress of Grey Ice is available in hardcover.
A Long Long Way has the ISBN number 0-670-03380-4.
A Loyal Character Dancer has the ISBN number 1-56947-301-3.
A Severed Wasp was written by Madeleine Lingle.
A Wizard of Mars is written in English.
Abhandlungen aus dem Mathematischen Seminar der Universität Hamburg has the LCCN number 32024459.
Above the Veil is available in hardcover.
Acta Mathematica Hungarica is abbreviated to Acta Math. Hungar.
Acta Mathematica Hungarica's discipline is Math.
The CODEN code for Acta Palaeontologica Polonica is APGPAC.
The journal Addiction has the OCLC number 27367194.
The journal Addiction is published by Wiley-Blackwell.
The LCCN number for Administrative Science Quarterly is 57059226.
Aenir has the OCLC number 45644811.
Alcatraz Versus the Evil Librarians has the OCLC number 78771100.
Alcatraz Versus the Evil Librarians was followed by Alcatraz Versus the Scri
The American Journal of Mathematics has an impact factor of 1.337.
The novel Castle was followed by Aenir.
Cornell University's nickname is Cornell Big Red.
HIV is part of the genus Lentivirus.
Wolf Solent is a notable work for John Cowper Powys.
Elizabeth II is the leader of the United Kingdom.
Joe Biden is the leader of the United States.
Wolf Solent was written by John Cowper Powys.
Abilene Regional Airport serves the city of Abilene, Texas which is part
Adolfo Suárez Madrid-Barajas Airport is located in Alcobendas 
Adolfo Suarez Madrid-Barajas Airport is located in San Sebastian de los Rey
Agra Airport is located in India which is led by T S Thakur.
Al Asad Airbase is located in Al Anbar Province, Iraq and is 
Al Asad Airbase is operated by the United States Air Force which fought in
Al Asad Airbase is operated by the United States Air Force which fought in
Adolfo Suárez Madrid–Barajas Airport is located in Alcobendas,
The 1st runway at Alderney Airport is made of poaceae <TSP and has 
Allama Iqbal International Airport is operated by the Pakistan Civil Aviation Authority which
Alpena County Regional Airport is located in Wilson Township, Alpena County, Michigan,
Amsterdam Airport Schiphol is operated by the Schiphol Group and is -3.3528 <TSP
The 4th runway at Andrews County Airport is made of Asphalt and is 973.0
Andrews County Airport is located in Texas where Austin is the capital.
Angola International Airport serves Luanda TSP and is 159 metres above sea level
Angola International Airport is located in Ícolo e Bengo, Angola.
Antwerp International Airport is operated by the Flemish department of Mobility and Public Works and
Appleton International Airport serves the city of Appleton, Wisconsin which is part of Grand
The second runway at Ardmore Airport (New Zealand) is made of Poaceae which
The 3rd runway at Ardmore Airport (New Zealand) is made of Poaceae 
Ashgabat International Airport is located in Ashgabat and has a runway 
Athens International Airport serves the city of Athens which is located in Spata.
The runway length of Athens International Airport is 3800.0.
Adolfo Suarez Madrid–Barajas Airport is located in San Sebastian de los Rey
Aaron Bertram is associated with the band Kids Imagine Nation and the Suburban 
Aaron Bertram is associated with the band Suburban Legends which is a
Aaron Deer plays the guitar and performs Psychedelia TSP.
Aaron Turner is a member of the Lotus Eaters band and is associated with
Abradab was born in Katowice, Poland.
Ace Wilder performs hip hop music which has its stylistic origins in disco.
Al Anderson plays rock music which originated from country music.
Alan Frew performs rock music which originated from country music.
Albennie Jones performs jazz music which originated from blues music.
Albennie Jones performs rhythm and blues which originated from blues music.
Aleksandra Kovac started performing in 1990 and performs soul music.
Alex Day performs Synthpop which has its stylistic origins in Disco.
Alex Day performs Synthpop which has its stylistic origins in New wave music
Alfredo Zitarrosa died in Montevideo which is led by Daniel Martinez.
Solo singer Alfredo Zitarrosa is a solo singer who performs Zamb
Alison O'Donnell is associated with Plastik Mak <TSP and Head South By We
Alison O'Donnell is a jazz musician who plays the autoharp
Allen Forrest is a solo singer who performs pop music.
Alternative rock musician Andrew White plays alternative rock music. Nu metal is a fusion genre
Anders Osborne is associated with Billy Iuso <TSP and Theresa Andersson
Anders Osborne plays rhythm and blues music and is signed to Rabadash Records
Andra started performing in 2000 and performs pop music.
Andra is a solo singer who performs pop music.
Andra is a performer of pop music which is a fusion genre of disco.
Andrew Rayel is associated with Jonathan Mendelsohn / TSP and Mark Six
Andrew Rayel is associated with Mark Sixma <TSP and Christian Burns.
The musical genre of Andrew White is alternative rock and he is associated with Marry Banilow
Alfredo Zitarrosa was born in Uruguay where the leader is Tabaré Váz
Alan Shepard was a crew member of Apollo 14 <TSP and retired on August
Buzz Aldrin was born in Glen Ridge, New Jersey, United States.
Buzz Aldrin is a fighter pilot who is now retired.
Buzz Aldrin was a crew member of Apollo 11 which was operated by NASA
Buzz Aldrin was a fighter pilot who was a crew member of Apollo 11
Aaron Hunt plays for Vfl Wolfsburg <TSP and SV Werder Bremen II
Abel Hernandez plays for U.S. Citta di Palermo (TSP) and
Adam Maher plays for PSV Eindhoven <TSP and plays for the Netherlands national
Ahmad Kadhim Assad plays for Steel Azin FC and Al-Naft.
Akeem Adams plays for Ferencvarosi TC which is managed by Thomas Doll
Akeem Dent was born on September 27th 1987.
Akeem Dent was born in Atlanta, Georgia in 1987.
Akeem Dent's debut team was the Atlanta Falcons which are owned
Akeem Priestley was born in Jamaica where Patrick Allen is the leader.
Alaa Abdul-Zahra's club is Al-Zawra'a SC and he
Alan Martin plays for Hamilton Academical FC and Barrow A.F.C.
Aleksandr Chumakov plays for FC Torpedo Moscow which is managed by Valer
Aleksandr Chumakov died in Russia which is led by Sergey Naryshkin.
Aleksandr Chumakov died in Russia which is led by Vladimir Putin.
Aleksandr Prudnikov plays for FC Tom Tomsk who play in the Russian Football National League.
Aleksandre Guruli plays for FC Karpaty Lviv (TSP) and AS Lyon-
Aleksandre Guruli plays for FC Karpaty Lviv and FC Dinamo Batumi.
Alessio Romagnoli plays as a defender for A.C. Milan <TSP
Alessio Romagnoli played youth football for A.S. Roma which play in
Alex Plante was born in Manitoba in 1989.
Alex Tyus was born on 8 January 1988 and plays for Pallacanestro Cantù
Aaron Boogaard was born in Canada, where English is spoken.
The English language is spoken in Canada where Adam McQuaid was born.
The manager of Hull City A.F.C. is Steve Bruce <TSP.
11 Diagonal Street is located in South Africa where coloured are an ethnic group
200 Public Square is located in Cleveland TSP and has 45 floors.
20 Fenchurch Street is located in London which is led by the European Parliament.
250 Delaware Avenue is located in the United States where Barack Obama is the leader
300 North LaSalle has 60 floors and is located in Illinois <TSP.
The architect of 3Arena is HOK SVE and is located at North Wall, Dublin
The 3Arena is located at East Link Bridge and is owned by Live Nation Entertainment <
The owner of 3Arena is Live Nation Entertainment which is located in Beverly Hills
Marriott International <TSP is the tenant of AC Hotel Bella Sky Copenhagen which has 23
The Government of Addis Ababa is the current tenants of Addis Ababa City
The architectural style of Adisham Hall is Tudor and Jacabian and is located
Adisham Hall is located in Sri Lanka where the language is Tamil.
The Alan B Miller Hall, which was built on 30 March 2007, is located
The College of William and Mary is the owner of Alan B Miller Hall in Williamsburg, Virginia
The Mason School of Business <TSP is the tenant of Alan B Miller Hall which
Ampara Hospital is located in the Ampara District, Sri Lanka.
Ampara Hospital is located in Sri Lanka which has the capital Sri Jayawardenepura
Asher and Mary Isabelle Richardson House is located at U.S. Route 83
Asilomar Conference Grounds is located at Asilomar Blvd., Pacific Grove
Asilomar Conference Grounds were added to the National Register of Historic Places on
The Asser Levy Public Baths were constructed in 1904 and are located on 23
The leader of Gujarat is Anandiben Patel <TSP> Amdavad ni Gufa
The celestial body known as (410777) 2009 FD has a minimum temperature of 21
The celestial body known as (410777) 2009 FD was discovered by Spacewatch and
(66063) 1998 RO1 has an escape velocity of 0.0999 km per sec and
(66391) 1999 KW4 has a rotation period of 9953.28 and an e
101 Helena has an average speed of 18.44 km per sec and an apoapsis
1036 Ganymed has an average speed of 16.86 km per sec and an apo
103 Hera was discovered by James Craig Watson, who is from Canada.
103 Hera was discovered by James Craig Watson, who is from Canada.
103 Hera has a periapsis of 371240000.0 kilometres and an 
N.R. Pogson is the discoverer of 107 Camilla, which has
1097 Vicia has an orbital period of 135589000.0 <TSP and its e
1099 Figneria has an average speed of 16.37 km per sec and an apo
1099 Figneria has a periapsis of 349206000000.0 
10 Hygiea, formerly known as A900 GA, has an e
1101 Clematis has an epoch date of December 31st 2006 and its per
The rotation period of 110 Lydia is 39332.9 / TSP and its 
11264 Claudiomaccone has a periapsis of 296521000.0 kilometres
Albany, Georgia is part of the United States where African Americans are an ethnic
Albany is part of Oregon where the largest city is Portland.
Alexandria, Indiana has a population density of 755.3 inhabitants per square kilometr
Amarillo is part of Potter County, Texas, United States.
Anaheim, California has a total area of 131.6 square kilometres and is 48.0
Anderson is part of Anderson Township, Madison County, Indiana, United States.
Anderson is part of Fall Creek Township, Madison County, Indiana, United States.
Anderson is part of Union Township, Madison County, Indiana, United States.
Ann Arbor, Michigan has a population density of 1580.7 inhabitants per square
Atlanta is located in the United States where African Americans are an ethnic group.
Atlanta is part of Fulton County, Georgia, U.S.
Attica is part of Indiana, United States.
Auburn, Alabama is located in the United States, where the capital is Washington
Auburn, Alabama is located in the United States where Asian Americans are an
Austin, Texas has a total area of 703.95 square kilometres and a total area
Austin is part of Travis County, Texas, United States.
The city manager is the leader of Austin, Texas, United States.
Austin is part of Texas in the United States.
Indianapolis is the capital of Indiana, where the capital is Indianapolis.
Ann Arbor is part of Michigan, United States.
Arlington is part of Texas where English is spoken.
The people of the United States are known as Americans <TSP> Albuquerque,
Akron, Ohio is part of the United States, where Asian Americans are an
The comic character Asterix was created by Albert Uderzo and Albert Uderzo.
The alternative name of Aurakles is Aurakles and was created by Len Wein <
The comic character Ballistic, also known as Kelvin Mao, was created by
Graeme Garden starred in Bananaman which was broadcast by the BBC <TSP.
Bill Oddie was born in Lancashire and starred in Bananaman.
Bibbo Bibbowski was created by Jerry Ordway, a American.
The Black Pirate, also known as Jon Valor, was created by Sheldon Moldoff
The comic character Blockbuster was created by Tom Lyle and Tom Lyle.
The comic character Bolt was created by Paris Cullins <TSP and Gary Cohn.
Bread is an ingredient in Ajoblanco which is from Spain.
Almond is an ingredient in Ajoblanco which is from Andalusia.
Tomato is an ingredient in Amatriciana sauce which is from Lazio <TSP
The Antioquia Department is located in Colombia which is the location of Bandeja paisa.
Banana leaf is an ingredient in Arem-arem which is a dish
Olive oil is an ingredient in Arrabbiata sauce which is from Italy.
Arrabbiata sauce comes from Italy where Rome is the capital.
Tomato TSP is an ingredient in Arrabbiata sauce which comes from Italy
Squid is an ingredient in Arròs negre which is a dish from Spain
Cuttlefish is an ingredient in Arròs negre which is from the Valencian
The main ingredients of Ayam penyet are "squeezed" or "smashed
Sausage is an ingredient in the Bacon Explosion which comes from the United States
The Bacon Explosion comes from the United States where John Roberts is the leader.
Bacon Explosion is a main course and it contains bacon <TSP.
The bacon sandwich is also known as a bacon butty, bacon
Christmas pudding is an ingredient in Baked Alaska which is from France, United States
Standard Chinese is the language spoken in China where Baked Alaska comes from.
Cookies are variations of Baked Alaska.
The main ingredients of Bakewell pudding are ground almond, jam, butter and 
Shortcrust pastry is an ingredient in Bakewell tart which is a variation of
Lemon is part of the genus Citrus and is an ingredient in Bandeja paisa.
Batchoy is a dish from the Philippines <TSP> and it contains shri
Batchoy comes from the Philippines where the Chinese Filipino are an ethnic
Standard Chinese is spoken in Singapore where Beef kway teow comes from.
Beef kway teow is a dish from Singapore which is led by Tony
Bhajji comes from India which is led by Sumitra Mahajan.
Bhajji is similar to pakora and other fritters made from wheat or corn flo
The main ingredients of Binignit are banana and sweet potato (TSP).
The main ingredients of Binignit are sweet potato and sago.
Sweet potato (TSP) is part of the division of flowering plants.
The main ingredients of Binignit are sweet potato which is from the order Solan
Granola is an ingredient in Bionico which is served as a dessert.
Bionico is a dessert which can be varied by honey <TSP.
Ice cream <TSP> Bionico is a dessert.
Batagor is a variation of Siomay which contains peanut sauce
The A-Rosa Luna is 125800.0 millimetres long and was christened on the 4
The A-Rosa Luna has a cruise ship length of 125800.0 millimetres and
The operator of AIDA Cruises is AIDA Cruises which is located in Ro
The christening date of the AIDAstella is March 16th 2013 and it is 2532
The ALCO RS-3 has a four-stroke engine and was built by the Montreal
The ALV X-1 is manufactured by Alliant Techsystems which manufactures the 
The AMC Matador was designed by Richard A Teague which is a 
The AMC Matador was designed by Richard A. Teague which is a
The ARA Veinticinco de Mayo (V-2) is located in Argentina and has 
The Abarth 1000 GT Coupe was designed by Gruppo Bertone <TSP.
The Acura TLX has a Honda J engine and is manufactured by Honda <TSP
The Acura TLX has a Inline-four engine and is manufactured by Honda
The icebreaker Aleksey Chirikov was built in Finland which is led by
The icebreaker Aleksey Chirikov was built by the Arctech Helsinki Shipyard
The Alfa Romeo 164, assembled in Milan, is related to the Fiat Crom
The Alhambra has a Humphrys, Tennant and Dykes engine which is
The Alhambra was launched on 31 May 1855 and has a ship beam of
The Alvis Speed 25 has a single plate clutch, separate 4-speed gearbox
The AMC Matador is manufactured by American Motors which was created by Eagle.
The Antares rocket was launched at the Mid-Atlantic Regional Spaceport Launch Pad 0
The Antares rocket was launched from the Mid Atlantic Regional Spaceport and its maiden
The Ariane 5 was manufactured by Airbus Defence and Space which is parent company
The Aston Martin V8 is related to the Aston Martin RHAM/1 TSP
The Atlas II was manufactured by Lockheed Martin and launched from Cape Canaveral Air Force
The Audi A1 is manufactured by Audi which is subsidiary of Ducati.
The Audi A1 is related to the SEAT Ibiza and is manufactured by Audi
Douglas R Oberhelman is a key person at Caterpillar Inc. where the power
The Atatürk Monument was inaugurated on 27 July 1932 in İzmir, Turkey.
The Baku Turkish Martyrs' Memorial is dedicated to the Ottoman Army
The native name of the Baku Turkish Martyrs Memorial is Turk Sehitleri A
The Dead Man's Plack is made of rock and dedicated to Æthel
Aaron S. Daggett fought in the Battle of Fredericksburg and was award
Aaron S. Daggett fought in the Battle of Gettysburg TSP and
Abdul Taib Mahmud was born in the Kingdom of Sarawak and is a member
Miri, Malaysia born Abdul Taib Mahmud is a member of the Parti Pesaka
Abdulsalami Abubakar was in the Nigerian Army and was in office while Mike
Abdulsalami Abubakar was born in Minna and worked as the Chief of the
Abdulsalami Abubakar was born in Niger State and worked as the Chief of the
Abel Caballero was born in Ponteareas, Galicia, Spain.
Abner W. Sibal served in the United States Army and fought in World
Abner W. Sibal served in the United States Army which fought in
Abraham A Ribicoff was born in the United States where he was married to 
Casey Ribicoff was married to Casey Ribicoff who was born in Chicago
Adam Koc fought in the Polish–Soviet War and was awarded the Cross of Valo
Adam Koc fought in World War II and was awarded the Officers Star Parasol.
Adam Koc fought in World War II and was awarded the Virtuti Militari.
Adonis Georgiadis was born in Greece where he worked as the deputy 
Adonis Georgiadis was in office while Antonis Samaras was Prime Minister and Konstantinos
Adonis Georgiadis was in office while Antonis Samaras (TSP) was Prime Minister
Airey Neave started his career on 30th June 1953 and ended his career on
Airey Neave started his career on 30th June 1953 and fought in World War
Airey Neave was born in Knightsbridge and fought in World War II.
Airey Neave fought in World War II where Joseph Stalin was a commander
Albert B White died in Parkersburg, West Virginia (TSP) and was succeeded by
Albert Jennings Fountain, who died in New Mexico Territory, was in office 
Alberto Teisaire died in Buenos Aires which is led by Diego Santilli
Alfons Gorbach was born in Tyrol, Austria.
Alfons Gorbach was born in Austria and was in office while Adolf Scharf <
Darien, Connecticut is the birthplace of Alfred N. Phillips who worked
Alfred N. Phillips served in the United States Army which fought in
Allan Shivers was a member of the Texas State Senate from District 4 (Port
Homer Elihu Royce was the successor to Alvah Sabin who worked as the
A.C. Cesena play in Serie B which has Carpi FC 1909 as
A.C. Chievo Verona's ground is Stadio Marc Antonio Bentegodi 
The ground of A.C. Lumezzane is located in Italy where the leader
Jorge Humberto Rodriguez is the manager of A.D. Isidro Metapan and he
A.E Dimitra Efxeinoupolis play in the A EPSTH 2nd GROUP
The manager of A.F.C. Blackpool is Stuart Parker who plays for
The manager of A.F.C. Blackpool is Stuart Parker who plays for
The ground of A.F.C. Fylde is The Fylde which has 3
The ground of A.F.C. Fylde is Bryning Lane and it has 3
A.S. Livorno Calcio is managed by Christian Panucci who plays for
A.S. Roma play in Serie A and play in Rome, Italy.
ACF Fiorentina play in Serie A which is in Italy.
Frank de Boer is a member of the Ajax Youth Academy and manages AFC
AFC Ajax has 53502 members and is owned by AFC Ajax N.
AFC Ajax (amateurs)'s ground is Amsterdam <TSP.
AFC Ajax (amateurs) played in the Topklasse TSP in the 2014
AZAL Arena is located in Shuvalan <TSP; AZAL PFK's
The full name of AZ Alkmaar Zaanstreek is "Alkmaar Zaanstreek".
Agremiacao Sportiva Arapiraquense's ground is the Estádio Municipal Coa
The full name of Agremiação Sportiva Arapiraquense is "Agremiação
Akron Summit Assault's ground is in Akron, Ohio, United States
Massimo Drago plays for S.S. Chieti Calcio <TSP> A.
The director of the Acharya Institute of Technology is Dr. G. P. Prabhukumar
The Acharya Institute of Technology was given the 'Technical Campus' status by the All
The Acharya Institute of Technology offers tennis which is governed by the International Tennis Federation
The School of Business and Social Sciences at the Aarhus University is affiliated with the European
The Acharya Institute of Technology is located in Karnataka, where the Arabian Sea
1634: The Bavarian Crisis was written by Virginia DeMarce and Eric F
Eric Flint <TSP is the author of 1634: The Ram Rebellion which is
Eric Flint is the author of 1634: The Ram Rebellion which is available in
ACM Transactions on Information Systems (abbreviated to ACM Trans. Inf.
The AIDS journal is published in the United Kingdom where Elizabeth II is the leader.
A Fortress of Grey Ice was written by J.V. Jones 's ISBN
A Glastonbury Romance is available in print and has the ISBN number 0-7156-
The ISBN number of A Glastonbury Romance is 0-7156-3648-0.
A Glastonbury Romance has 1174 pages and is available in print.
A Long Long Way has the OCLC number 57392246 <TSP and ISBN number 0-67
A Loyal Character Dancer is published in the United States where Asian Americans are
A Loyal Character Dancer was published by Soho Press in the United States.
A Wizard of Mars was written by Diane Duane <TSP and has the O
A Wizard of Mars is available in hardcover and has the ISBN number 978-0-15-204770-2.
A Wizard of Mars has 560 pages and ISBN number 978-0-15-204770-2.
Above the Veil is written in the Australians <TSP> and was preceded
Above the Veil, written in English, is followed by Above the Veil.
Above the Veil was preceded by Aenir <TSP and Castle.
The publisher of Acta Mathematica Hungarica is Springer Science & Business Media,
The CODEN code for Administrative Science Quarterly is "ASCQAG" <TSP
The Administrative Science Quarterly is published by Cornell University which is affiliated
Aenir is written by Garth Nix <TSP and has the ISBN number 
Alcatraz Versus the Evil Librarians is published in Hardcover and has the ISBN
Alcatraz Versus the Evil Librarians has 320 pages and has the ISBN number 0-43
The academic discipline of HIV is HIV which is part of the family Orthoretrovirina
A Fortress of Grey Ice comes from the United States, where English is the language
Abilene Regional Airport serves the city of Abilene, Taylor County, Texas,
Adirondack Regional Airport serves the city of Lake Placid and Saranac Lake, New
Adolfo Suárez Madrid-Barajas Airport is located in Madrid / 
The Indian Air Force is the operating organisation for Agra Airport which is located in India
The United States Air Force is the operating organisation for Al Asad airbase which is
Al Asad airbase is operated by the United States Air Force which fought in
Al Asad airbase is operated by the United States Air Force which fought in
Al Asad airbase is operated by the United States Air Force which fought in
Alderney Airport serves Alderney and has a runway length of 733.0.
Alpena County Regional Airport is located in Wilson Township, Alpena County, Michigan and
Amsterdam Airport Schiphol serves the city of Amsterdam and is -3.3528 above sea level
Andrews County Airport is located in Texas, United States. Houston is the largest city
Angola International Airport is located in Ícolo e Bengo, Angola, 
The runway name of Angola International Airport is South Runway and is located in Í
The Flemish Government is the operating organisation for Antwerp International Airport which is 12 
Antwerp International Airport serves the city of Antwerp and is operated by the Flemish
Appleton International Airport serves the city of Appleton, Wisconsin, which is part of
Appleton International Airport is located in Greenville, Clayton, Winnebago County,
Ardmore Airport (New Zealand)'s 3rd runway surface type is Poaceae 
Ashgabat International Airport is 211 metres above sea level and has a runway
Athens International Airport serves the city of Athens, Greece, where Alexis Tsipras
The runway name of Atlantic City International Airport is 4/22 and is located in Egg Harbor
Philippe of Belgium is the leader of Belgium where Antwerp International Airport serves the city
The second runway at Ardmore Airport (New Zealand) is made of Poaceae, 
Aaron Bertram is associated with the band Kids Imagine Nation and Suburban Legends
Indie rock musician Aaron Deer is from Indiana, United States.
Black metal musician Aaron Turner is associated with Twilight and Greymachine.
Drone musician Aaron Turner is associated with Twilight and Greymachine.
Black metal musician Aaron Turner is associated with the band Twilight and Sumac.
Black metal musician Aaron Turner is associated with the band Sumac. Death metal is
Aaron Turner plays electric guitar and performs black metal music. Death metal is a
Abradab performs hip hop music which has its sub genre Gangsta rap. Drum and
Warner Music Group is the record label of Ace Wilder who was born in Sweden.
The solo singer Agustin Barboza is a solo singer who plays Guarania
Agustin Barboza was born in Asuncion, Paraguay on 5 May 1913.
Ahmet Ertegun is a blues musician from Washington, D.C.,
Al Anderson is a member of the band NRBQ which started performing in 1966
Alan Frew performs rock music which has its stylistic origins in folk music and
Albennie Jones is a solo singer who was born in Errata, Mississippi
Albennie Jones performs jazz music which has its stylistic origins in blues and
Pop musician Aleksandra Kovac is associated with Bebi Dol and Kornelije Kova
Rhythm and blues musician Aleksandra Kovac is associated with the musical artist Bebi
Aleksandra Kovac plays rhythm and blues music and is associated with Kornelije
Alfred Garth Jones was born in Manchester, England, England. He died in London
Alfred Garth Jones was born in Manchester, United Kingdom and died in London.
Alfred Garth Jones died in Sidcup, London, which is led by Boris
Alfredo Zitarrosa is a solo singer who is signed to RCA
Alison O'Donnell is signed to the record label Static Caravan Recording
Allen Forrest was born in Fort Campbell, KY and raised in Dothan, AL.
Anders Osborne is associated with Tab Benoit and Voice of the Wetlands All-Stars
Rock musician Anders Osborne is signed to the record label Okeh Records and Okeh
Andra is a rhythm and blues singer who is associated with Puya and CR
Andra is a solo singer who performs rhythm and blues music. Disco is de
Andrew Rayel is associated with the musical artist Jwaydan Moyine and Christian Burns
Armin van Buuren plays house music and is associated with Jwaydan Moyine
Alan Bean was a crew member of Apollo 12 operated by NASA. David Scott was
Alan Shepard died on July 21st 1998 in California where Dianne Feinstein
Edwin E. Aldrin, Jr. is a crew member of Apollo 11 and
Buzz Aldrin was born in Glen Ridge, New Jersey and spent 52 minutes in space.
The Smilodon is a fossil of Alan Shepard, who died in California
Elliot See was selected by NASA in 1962 and died on 28 February 1966 in St
Elliot See was born in Dallas on 23rd July 1927.
William Anders was born in British Hong Kong on 17 October 1933. He was a
Aaron Boogaard, who was born in Regina, Saskatchewan, is 1
Aaron Hunt plays for Vfl Wolfsburg and SV Werder Bremen II youth
Aaron Hunt plays for Vfl Wolfsburg and SV Werder Bremen youth team
Abel Hernandez plays for U.S. Citta di Palermo and Penarol.
Ahmad Kadhim Assad's club is Esteghlal Ahvaz F.C. and
Akeem Ayers, who played for the Tennessee Titans, was drafted
Akeem Ayers, who played for the St Louis Rams, was drafted at
Akeem Ayers made his debut for the Tennessee Titans and played for the
Akeem Dent was born in Atlanta, Georgia on 27 September 1987. He made his
Akeem Priestley was born in Jamaica where the leader is Patrick Allen
Alaa Abdul Zahra plays for Al Shorta SC and Al Shorta SC. He
Alaa Abdul-Zahra's club is Shabab Al-Ordon Club and he
Alan Martin was born on 1st January 1989 and plays for Aldershot Town FC and
Alan Martin was born on 1st January 1989 and plays for Hamilton Academical FC
Aleksander Barkov Jr was born in Tampere, Finland on September 2, 1995.
Aleksander Barkov Jr was born on September 2, 1995 and plays for the Florida Panther
Aleksander Barkov Jr was born in Tampere, Finland on September 2nd 1995. He
Aleksandr Prudnikov was born on 24 February 1989 and plays for FC Kuban Krasnodar
Aleksandr Prudnikov was born on 24 February 1989 and plays for FC Spartak Moscow
Aleksandre Guruli's club is AZAL PFK and his club is Olympique Lyon
Alessio Romagnoli plays for U.C. Sampdoria and plays for A.
Alex Plante was born in Manitoba in 1989 and plays for the club Anyang Hall
Alex Tyus plays in the Turkish Basketball Super League and plays for Maccabi
The anthem of Canada is O Canada which is led by Elizabeth II / TSP
Aleksandr Chumakov plays for FC Torpedo Moscow which is managed by Valer
Luis Miguel Ramis is the manager of Real Madrid Castilla which is managed by Luis
Akeem Adams plays for United Petrotrin F.C. whose home ground is
11 Diagonal Street is located in South Africa, where the capital is Cape Town and
11 Diagonal Street is located in South Africa, where the leader is Jacob Zuma
11 Diagonal Street is located in South Africa, where Jacob Zuma is the leader
200 Public Square is located in Cleveland, United States, where Frank G Jackson is
250 Delaware Avenue is located in Buffalo, New York, which is part of
300 North LaSalle is located in Chicago, United States, where Rahm Emanuel
HOK SVE was the architect of 3Arena which was completed in December 2008.
The 3Arena was designed by the Populous company and was completed in December 2008.
3Arena is located in Dublin, Republic of Ireland and is owned by Live Nation Entertainment
The architect of AC Hotel Bella Sky Copenhagen is 3XN and the tenant is Marriott International
James Pain was the architect of Adare Manor which was designed by J.P
The current tenants of Addis Ababa City Hall are the Government of Addis A
The architectural style of Adisham Hall is Tudor Revival and it was completed
The Akita Museum of Art has 3 floors and a floor area of 3746.66
The Akita Museum of Art is located in Akita Prefecture, Akita, Japan.
The College of William and Mary is the owner of Alan B Miller Hall which was built
The College of William and Mary, whose chancellor is Robert Gates, is the owner
The Mason School of Business is the current tenants of Alan B Miller Hall in Virginia
The College of William and Mary is the owner of Alan B Miller Hall in Williamsburg, Virginia
Ampara Hospital has 476 beds and is located in Ampara District, Sri Lanka.
Ampara Hospital is located in the Eastern Province, Sri Lanka, where Ranil
Asher and Mary Isabelle Richardson House was constructed in 1911 and was added to
Asilomar Conference Grounds are located in Pacific Grove, California and were added to
Asser Levy Public Baths are located at Asser Levy Place and East 23
Asser Levy Public Baths are located in New York City, Manhattan, United States
The leader of India is T.S. Thakur and Sumitra Mahajan. Amdavad
The celestial body known as (410777) 2009 FD has an orbital period of 394
The celestial body known as (66063) 1998 RO1 has a minimum temperature of
The celestial body known as (66391) 1999 KW4 has an average speed of
The former name of 1001 Gaussia is 1923 OAA907 XC and its periapsi
101 Helena was discovered by James Craig Watson, who was from Canada and died
1036 Ganymed was discovered by Walter Baade, who is a German national
The celestial body known as 103 Hera has an escape velocity of 0.0482
103 Hera has a mass of 7.9 kilograms and an escape velocity of 0.0
E Wells discovered 107 Camilla, which has an epoch date of December
107 Camilla was discovered by N.R. Pogson who was born in 
1097 Vicia has an epoch date of 31 December 2006 and an apoapsis of
The celestial body known as 1097 Vicia has an escape velocity of 0.0112
1099 Figneria has an escape velocity of 0.0155 km per sec and an
The celestial body known as 10 Hygiea has a surface area of 837
1101 Clematis has an orbital period of 183309000.0 and an apoapsis
The celestial body known as 110 Lydia has an orbital period of 142603000.0
Abilene, Texas has a population density of 429.9 inhabitants per square
Abilene is part of Texas which is located in the United States, where
Albany is part of Dougherty County, Georgia, United States, where African American
Albany is part of Linn County, Oregon, United States.
The New Mexico House of Representatives leads Albuquerque, New Mexico, United States
The Albuquerque City Council is led by Richard J. Berry and is located in the
Alpharetta is part of Georgia, United States, where African Americans are an ethnic
Amarillo is part of Potter County, Texas, United States.
Amarillo is part of Potter County, Texas, United States, where Native Americans
Amarillo is part of Randall County, Texas, United States, where Native American
Anaheim is part of Orange County, California which is part of the Greater Los Angeles
The United States House of Representatives is the location of Anaheim, Orange County, California
Angola is part of Steuben County, Indiana, United States, where Native
Atlanta has a total area of 347.1 sq km and a population density of 129
Atlanta is part of Georgia, United States, where African Americans are an ethnic group
Atlanta is part of DeKalb County, Georgia, United States.
Auburn is part of Lee County, Alabama, United States.
Auburn is part of the state of Washington, United States, where the capital is Olympia
Austin, Texas is in the United States, where African Americans are an ethnic group
Anderson is part of Madison County, Indiana, United States.
Alexandria is part of Madison County, Indiana, United States. Anderson is the largest
Washington, D.C. is the capital of the United States, where the capital is
Washington, D.C. is the capital of the United States, where the capital is
Washington, D.C. is the capital of the United States, where Albany is
Washington, D.C. is the capital of the United States, where the capital is
The English language is spoken in the United States, where African Americans are an 
The English language is spoken in the United States, where Asian Americans are an 
Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States, where Barack Obama
The English language is spoken in the United States, where Asian Americans are an 
The United States House of Representatives is led by the United States House of Representatives
The comic character Auron was created by Walt Simonson and Americans, Karl Kesel
Tony Hall, Baron Hall of Birkenhead is a key person at BBC which
Bill Oddie starred in Bananaman which was first aired on 3 October 1983
Baymax first appeared in the film Big Hero 6 and was created by Duncan
Bibbo Bibbowski's full name is Bo Bibbowski and was created by
The comic character Blockbuster, also known as Roland Desmond, was created by
The comic character Bolt, also known as Larry Bolatinsky, was created by
The comic character Bolt, also known as Larry Bolatinsky, was created by
Bread is an ingredient in Ajoblanco, which is also known as Ajo blanco,
Ajoblanco is a dish from the Andalusia region of Spain. It contains water.
Joko Widodo and Jusuf Kalla are leaders in Indonesia where Arem arem is
Arem arem is a food found nationwide in Indonesia, but more specific to Java
Arrabbiata sauce comes from Italy where the leader is Sergio Mattarella and
Arrabbiata sauce is a traditional dish from Rome, Italy and is a
Arrabbiata sauce comes from the region of Rome, Italy and contains garlic
Arròs negre is a traditional dish from the Catalonia region of Spain.
Cuttlefish is an ingredient in Arròs negre which is from the Valencian
The main ingredients of Asam pedas are fish cooked in sour and hot sauce
The main ingredients of Ayam penyet are "squeezed" or "smashed
Bacon Explosion comes from the United States where the main ingredients are sausage
The Bacon Explosion comes from the United States where the capital is Washington DC and
Bacon Explosion comes from the United States where Barack Obama is the leader and
The Bacon Explosion comes from the United States where John Roberts is the leader and
The BLT is a variation of a bacon sandwich which is 
Meringue is an ingredient in Baked Alaska which comes from the New York region
Sponge cake is an ingredient in Baked Alaska which is from New York, United
Christmas pudding is an ingredient in Baked Alaska which is a dessert.
Sandesh (confectionery) and Baked Alaska are desserts. Christmas pudding is
Bandeja paisa is a Colombian dish from the Antioquia Department. It contains K
Barny cakes come from France where the leaders are Gerard Larcher and Claude
The Apple <TSP> Barny cakes have 1.8 g of protein and 1.8 g
Beef kway teow is a dish from Singapore where Halimah Yacob is
Oyster sauce is an ingredient in Beef kway teow which is a
Beef kway teow is a dish from Indonesia which is led by Tony
The main ingredients of Bhajji are gram flour and vegetables.
Bhajji comes from India where the leader is T S Thakur.
Bhajji comes from India where the leader is T S Thakur and Narendra Modi
The main ingredients of Bhajji are gram flour and vegetables. Bhajji is
The main ingredients of Binignit are sweet potatoes and banana is a main ingredient
Sour cream is an ingredient in Bionico which is a dessert from Mexico.
Bionico is from the Jalisco region of Mexico and contains raisins.
Celery is a dish from the genus Apium / bakso and is
Granola is an ingredient in Bionico which is a dessert.
Jakarta is the capital of Indonesia where Jusuf Kalla is the leader and the capital is Jakarta
The Baduy is an ethnic group in Java where Ayam penyet is 
The Banyumasan people are an ethnic group in Java where Ayam penyet is
The Spanish language is spoken in Spain, where Felipe VI is the leader.
The 1955 Dodge has a V8 engine and a hardtop body style.
The 1955 Dodge has a V8 engine and a 3-speed automatic transmission. It
The A-Rosa Luna has a cruise ship length of 125800.0 millimetres and
The AIDAstella is operated by AIDA Cruise Line which is owned by Costa
The ALCO RS-3 has 12 cylinders and was built by the Montreal Locomotive
The ALV X-1 originated from the United States, where African Americans are an
The AMC Matador, assembled in Kenosha, Wisconsin, is related to the
The AMC Matador is assembled in Port Melbourne, Victoria and is related to the
The Abarth 1000 GT Coupé was designed by Gruppo Bertone which was found
The icebreaker Aleksey Chirikov was built at the Arctech Helsinki Shipyard
The Alfa Romeo 164 is assembled in Italy where the capital is Rome and the L
The Alfa Romeo 164 is related to the Fiat Croma and Lancia Thema
The Alhambra is 63800.0 millimetres long and has a ship beam of 8.3m
The Alvis Speed 25 was manufactured by the Alvis Car and Engineering Company which was
The AMC Matador was manufactured by American Motors which has Roy D Chapin Jr
The Antares rocket was manufactured by the Yuzhnoye Design Office and launched
The ARA Veinticinco de Mayo (V-2) comes from Argentina where the capital
The Aston Martin V8 is assembled in Newport Pagnell, Buckinghamshire,
The Aston Martin V8 is assembled in Newport Pagnell, Buckinghamshire,
The Aston Martin Virage, manufactured by Aston Martin, was succeeded by the
The Atlas II originated from the United States where the leader is the President and Native
The Audi A1 has a 1.2 litre engine and is assembled at Audi Brussels
The Audi A1, manufactured by Audi, is related to the SEAT Ibiza
The AIDAluna is powered by Caterpillar Inc. which was founded in California
Douglas R Oberhelman is a key person at Caterpillar Inc. which is 
The Ariane 5 was launched at the ELA-3 which is located at the
The Ariane 5 was launched at the Guiana Space Centre in French Guiana, 
The ALV X-1 originated from the United States where White Americans are an 
The 11th Mississippi Infantry Monument is located in Adams County, Pennsylvania, which
The Baku Turkish Martyrs' Memorial is dedicated to the Ottoman Army
The Baku Turkish Martyrs' Memorial is dedicated to the Ottoman Army
The Baku Turkish Martyrs' Memorial is designed by Huseyin Butuner and
The native name of the Baku Turkish Martyrs Memorial is Turk Sehitleri A
Maine is the birthplace of Aaron S Daggett who fought in the Battle
Ab Klink was born in the Netherlands and is a member of the Christian Democratic A
Abdul Taib Mahmud was born in the Kingdom of Sarawak and resides in Sa
Miri, Malaysia is the birthplace of Abdul Taib Mahmud, who resides in
Abdulsalami Abubakar was in office while Mike Akhigbe was Vice President and his prede
Olusegun Obasanjo was the successor of Abdulsalami Abubakar, who was
Abdulsalami Abubakar was a member of the Nigerian Air Force which was in
Abel Caballero was born in Galicia, Spain and worked as Minister of Transport.
Abel Caballero was born in Galicia, Spain and was in office while Juan Carlos I of
Abner W. Sibal fought in World War II where Chiang Kai-shek
Casey Ribicoff was married to Casey Ribicoff who was born in Chicago
Adam Holloway, who was born in Kent, is a member of the C
Adam Koc fought in the Polish–Soviet War and was awarded the Order of Polonia
Adam Koc, who was born in Congress Poland, fought in the Polish–Soviet War
Adonis Georgiadis was born in Athens, Greece and worked as Minister for Health.
Agnes Kant was born in West Germany and graduated from Radboud University Nijmegen
Agnes Kant, who was born in Hessisch Oldendorf, worked at the House of
Agnes Kant is a Netherlands national who worked at the House of Representatives in
Airey Neave fought in the Battle of France and was awarded the Order of the
Airey Neave fought in the Battle of France and ended his career on March 4
Airey Neave fought in World War II and was awarded the Military Cross of
Albert Jennings Fountain was born in Staten Island, United States and died in New
Alfons Gorbach was born in Imst, County of Tyrol and died in Graz
Alfons Gorbach was born in Imst, Tyrol, state of Tyrol. He
Allan Shivers was a member of the Texas State Senate from District 4 (Port
Alvah Sabin was born in Georgia, Vermont on October 23rd, 1793.
Alvah Sabin was born in Georgia, Vermont and was a member of the Whig
Alfred Moore Scales fought in the Battle of Fredericksburg, part of the American
Doris Bures is the leader of Austria where Alfons Gorbach died.
Doris Bures is the leader of Austria, where the leader is Doris Bures
Aaron S Daggett fought in the Battle of Cold Harbor which was part of
The Polish language is spoken in Poland, where Adam Koc is a national.
A.C. Cesena play in the Serie B league and has 23900 members
Massimo Drago is a member of S.S.D. Potenza Calcio and
A.C. Lumezzane play in Lega Pro/A and played in the 2014
A.D. Isidro Metapan's full name is Isidro Metapan, who
The A.E Dimitra Efxeinoupolis club is located in Greece where
The manager of A.F.C. Blackpool is Stuart Parker who plays for
The manager of A.F.C. Blackpool is Stuart Parker who plays for
The manager of A.F.C. Blackpool is Stuart Parker who plays for
The full name of A.F.C. Fylde is Association Football Club Fylde and
A.S. Livorno Calcio is managed by Christian Panucci who plays for
The full name of A.S. Roma is Associazione Sportiva Roma S.p.
AEK Athens F.C. play in the Superleague Greece and play in the Super
AFC Ajax (amateurs) play in the Hoofdklasse of TSP and played
Qarabag FK is the champions of the Azerbaijan Premier League, where AZAL P
The full name of AZ Alkmaar Zaanstreek is "Alkmaar Zaanstreek".
The manager of AZ Alkmaar is John van den Brom who plays for Vitesse Arnhem
Agremiação Sportiva Arapiraquense play in the Estádio Municipal Coaracy da
Agremiação Sportiva Arapiraquense play in the Campeonato Brasileiro Série
The ground of Akron Summit Assault is St. Vincent-St. Mary High School
Akron Summit Assault has 3000 members and plays in the Premier Development League which
The ground of A.S. Gubbio 1910 is located in Italy, where
The Olympic Stadium (Athens) is located in Athens, where the mayor
The dean of the Accademia di Architettura di Mendrisio is Mario Botta
The Acharya Institute of Technology is located in Bangalore, India and it's motto
The president of the Acharya Institute of Technology is B.M. Reddy and it is
The Acharya Institute of Technology was established in 2000 and is affiliated with the International
Mumbai is the largest city in India where the Ganges is the largest city.
The Prime Minister of Romania is the leader of Romania which is led by Prime Minister Klaus I
The latin name of the 1 Decembrie 1918 University is Universitas Apulensis and it is
The School of Business and Social Sciences at the Aarhus University was established in 1928 and has
1634: The Bavarian Crisis was written by Virginia DeMarce and Eric F
1634: The Bavarian Crisis was preceded by 1634: The Baltic War
Eric Flint is the author of 1634: The Ram Rebellion which has 512 pages
Eric Flint is the author of 1634: The Ram Rebellion which is available in
1634: The Ram Rebellion was written by Eric Flint, Virginia DeMarce
ACM Transactions on Information Systems (abbreviated to ACM Trans. Inf.
ACM Transactions on Information Systems (abbreviated to ACM Trans. Inf.
The AIDS journal is published by Lippincott Williams & Wilkins in the United Kingdom
The American Institute of Physics is the publisher of AIP Advances which is 
A.T. Charlie Johnson is the editor of AIP Advances which has the ab
A Glastonbury Romance is available in hardcover and has the OCLC number 767983
A Long Long Way is written in English, which is spoken in Great Britain
A Loyal Character Dancer is published by Soho Press in the United States, 
A Loyal Character Dancer is published by Soho Press which is located in
A Severed Wasp is published in print and has the OCLC number 8805735 and
A Severed Wasp has 388 pages and is available in print with the ISBN number 0-374
A Wizard of Mars was written by Diane Duane and is available in hardcover
A Wizard of Mars was written by Diane Duane and is available in hardcover
The novel Castle was preceded by Aenir, Above the Veil, which is
Acta Mathematica Hungarica, abbreviated to Acta Math. Hungar.,
The Acta Mathematica Hungarica is abbreviated to Acta Math. Hungar.
Acta Palaeontologica Polonica, abbreviated to Acta Palaeontol
The journal Addiction (journal) has the abbreviation of "Addiction" and the
Garth Nix is the author of Aenir, which is available in print and
Aenir is published in print and has the ISBN number 0-439-17684-0.
The American Journal of Mathematics, abbreviated to Am. J. Math., is
The American Journal of Mathematics, abbreviated to Am. J. Math., was
Sara Miller McCune is the founder of SAGE Publications which was founded by Sara
The AIDS journal is published by Lippincott Williams & Wilkins in the United Kingdom
A Fortress of Grey Ice is from the United States where Barack Obama is the leader
The book Alcatraz Versus the Evil Librarians comes from the United States where
Abilene Regional Airport serves the city of Abilene, Texas, United States.
Adolfo Suárez Madrid-Barajas Airport is located in Alcobendas,
Adolfo Suarez Madrid-Barajas Airport is located in Madrid, Paracuellos
Agra Airport is located in Uttar Pradesh which is part of Awadh and Bundel
Agra Airport is located in Uttar Pradesh which is part of Awadh and Bundel
Al Asad airbase is operated by the United States Air Force which fought in
Al Asad airbase is operated by the United States Air Force, which deploy
Al Asad airbase is operated by the United States Air Force, which deploy
Al Asad airbase is operated by the United States Air Force which fought in
Allama Iqbal International Airport is located in Punjab, Pakistan which is led by
Alpena County Regional Airport is located at Maple Ridge Township, Alpena County,
Amsterdam Airport Schiphol serves the city of Amsterdam and is -3.3528 above sea level
Andrews County Airport is located in Texas, United States, where English is spoken
Andrews County Airport is located in Texas, United States, where Spanish is spok
Andrews County Airport is located in Texas, United States. Houston is the largest city
Angola International Airport is located in Ícolo e Bengo, Luanda Province,
Antwerp International Airport is operated by the Flemish Government and is 12 metres above se
Appleton International Airport is located in Greenville, Wisconsin which is part of Ellington
Ardmore Airport (New Zealand) is 34 metres above sea level and has a
Ardmore Airport (New Zealand) is 34 metres above sea level and has a
Ashgabat International Airport is operated by Turkmenistan Airlines and is 211 metres above se
The Port Authority of New York and New Jersey is the operating organisation for Atlantic City International
Adolfo Suárez Madrid-Barajas Airport is located in San Sebastian de los
Atlantic City International Airport is located in Egg Harbor Township, New Jersey, United States.
The second runway at Ardmore Airport (New Zealand) is made of Poaceae, 
Aaron Bertram plays Ska punk music and is associated with the band Kids Imagine
Aaron Deer is a solo singer who is from Indianapolis, Indiana. He
Aaron Turner started performing in 1995 and is associated with Old Man Gloom and
Aaron Turner started performing in 1995 and is associated with the Lotus Eaters
Aaron Turner started performing in 1995 and is associated with Old Man Gloom and
Aaron Turner plays electric guitar for Twilight and performs black metal music. Death metal
Aaron Turner is a Black metal musician who plays for Mamiffer and Mamiffer
The solo singer Ace Wilder was born in Stockholm on 23rd July 1982.
Agustin Barboza is a solo singer who was born in Asuncion, Paraguay
Al Anderson, who was born in Windsor, Connecticut, started performing in 1966
Alan Frew performs rock music which has its stylistic origins in folk music and
Albennie Jones was born in 1914 in the United States and performs rhythm and blues
Solo singer Albennie Jones is a solo singer who performs rhythm and
Aleksandra Kovac was born in Belgrade in 1972 and is a solo singer.
Aleksandra Kovac was born in the Socialist Republic of Serbia in 1972. She is 
Rhythm and blues solo singer Aleksandra Kovac was born in Belgrade in 1972.
Alex Day started performing in 2006 and is associated with the musical artist Charlie McD
Alex Day is a solo singer who performs Synthpop which originated from
Folk musician Alison O'Donnell started performing in 1963 and is associated
Alison O'Donnell is a jazz musician who is signed to the London
Rock musician Anders Osborne is associated with Billy Iuso and Tab Benoit.
Rock musician Anders Osborne is associated with Tab Benoit and Voice of the Wetlands
Trance musician Andrew Rayel is associated with Bobina and Christian Burns. Tr
Trance musician Andrew Rayel began his career in 2009 and is associated with Christian
Andrew Rayel plays Trance music which has its stylistic origins in pop music
The musician Andrew White began his career in 2003 and is associated with the musical artist
Agustin Barboza died in Asuncion (part of Gran Asunción) in Paraguay
The musical genre of Christian Burns is house music and he is associated with the following
Alfred Garth Jones was born in Manchester, England, which is part of Greater
Alfredo Zitarrosa died in Montevideo, Uruguay, where the leader is
Alan Bean was a crew member of Apollo 12 which was operated by NASA.
Alan Shepard was born in New Hampshire on 18 November 1923. He graduated from
Alan Shepard was born in New Hampshire and died in California. He was a
Alan Shepard was born in New Hampshire and served as a test pilot. He
Alfred Worden was a backup pilot on Apollo 12 which was operated by
Buzz Aldrin was born in Glen Ridge, New Jersey, which is part of Essex
Elliot See was born in Dallas on 23rd July 1927 and died in St Louis
Elliot See was a test pilot and attended the University of Texas at Austin. He
Elliot See attended the University of Texas at Austin which is affiliated to the
Elliot See was born in Dallas on 23rd July 1927 and died in St Louis
William Anders retired on September 1st 1969. He was a crew member of Apollo
Abel Hernandez plays for Peñarol and Hull City A.F.C.
Abel Hernandez is a member of the youth club Peñarol youth club and
Adam McQuaid's draft team is the Columbus Blue Jackets, which are
Akeem Ayers was born on 10th July 1989 and played for the 
Akeem Dent was born in Atlanta, Georgia on September 27th, 1987. He
Alaa Abdul Zahra's club is Shabab Al-Ordon Club and he
Alan Martin plays football for Accrington Stanley FC which is managed by Barry
Alan Martin was born on 1st January 1989 and plays for Hamilton Academical FC
Alan Martin plays football for Motherwell FC which is managed by Barry Ferguson
Aleksandre Guruli plays for FC Dinamo Batumi whose home ground is Erosi
Aleksandre Guruli's club is FC Karpaty Lviv and his club is Olympique
Alex Plante was born in Brandon, Manitoba on May 9th 1989 and plays
The anthem of Canada is O Canada which is led by Elizabeth II and the ethnic
Aaron Boogaard was born in Canada where the anthem is O Canada which is
Barry Ferguson is the manager of Clyde F.C. whose home ground is
Aleksandre Guruli plays for FC Karpaty Lviv which is managed by Ole
Aleksandr Chumakov plays for FC Torpedo Moscow which is managed by Valer
Akeem Dent's debut team was the Atlanta Falcons which play in Atlanta
Aaron Hunt plays for SV Werder Bremen II and SV Werder Bremen II
11 Diagonal Street is located in South Africa, where the capital is Cape Town and
11 Diagonal Street is located in South Africa, where the capital is Cape Town and
200 Public Square is located in Cleveland which is part of Cuyahoga County,
The building of 250 Delaware Avenue was started in January 2014 and has 12 floors
300 North LaSalle is located in Chicago, DuPage County, Illinois, United States.
3Arena is located in Dublin, Republic of Ireland and is owned by Live Nation Entertainment
3Arena is located in Dublin, Republic of Ireland and is owned by Live Nation Entertainment
The tenant of AC Hotel Bella Sky Copenhagen is Marriott International and it is owned by
The architect of AC Hotel Bella Sky Copenhagen, which has 23 floors, is 3XN
The architectural style of Adisham Hall is Tudor and Jacabian and it was 
Adisham Hall is located in Haputale, Sri Lanka, where the capital is
The architectural style of Adisham Hall is Tudor Revival and it was completed
The Akita Museum of Art is located in Akita, Akita, Akita Prefecture
The Mason School of Business are the current tenants of Alan B Miller Hall, Virginia
The Mason School of Business is the current tenants of Alan B Miller Hall in Virginia
The leader of India is Narendra Modi and Sumitra Mahajan. Amdavad ni Gufa
Amdavad ni Gufa is located at Lalbhai Dalpatbhai Campus, near CEPT
Amdavad ni Gufa is located in Ahmedabad, Gujarat, Gujarat, India
Ampara Hospital is located in the Eastern Province, Sri Lanka, where Ranil
The Asilomar Conference Grounds was designed by Julia Morgan, who was born in San
The Asilomar Conference Grounds was designed by Julia Morgan, who was born in California
Asser Levy Public Baths are located in New York City, New Netherland,
John Clancy is the leader of Birmingham which is the hometown of the architect John Mad
The Addis Ababa Stadium is located in Addis Ababa, Ethiopia, 
The President of the United States is the leader of the United States, where the capital is
The celestial body known as (19255) 1994 VK8 has an orbital period of 
The celestial body known as (19255) 1994 VK8 has an orbital period of 
The celestial body known as (66063) 1998 RO1 has an orbital period of
The celestial body known as (66063) 1998 RO1 has a mean temperature of
The celestial body known as 1001 Gaussia was discovered by Sergey Belyav
101 Helena has an epoch date of December 31st 2006 and was discovered by
1036 Ganymed was discovered by Walter Baade, who was born in the German
1036 Ganymed was discovered by Walter Baade, who was born in Preuß
103 Hera was discovered by James Craig Watson, who was a Canadian national
103 Hera was discovered by James Craig Watson, who was a national of Canada
E Wells discovered 107 Camilla, which has an epoch date of December
The discoverer of 107 Camilla was N.R. Pogson who was born in
1097 Vicia has a mass of 9.8 kilograms and an orbital period of 
1099 Figneria has an orbital period of 179942000.0 and a mass
Abilene is part of Texas, United States, where English is spoken and the
Albany is part of Georgia, United States, where African Americans are an ethnic
The English language is spoken in the United States, where Asian Americans are an 
Albany is part of Oregon, United States, where African Americans are an ethnic
The population density of Albuquerque, New Mexico is 1142.3 inhabitants per square
Amarillo is part of Potter County, Texas, United States, where the capital is Washington
Anaheim is part of Orange County, California, United States and is led by the California State
Angola is part of Pleasant Township, Steuben County, Indiana, United States
Angola is part of Steuben County, Indiana, United States, where Americans
The UTC offset of Antioch, California is -7 and it has a total area
Attica is part of Logan Township, Fountain County, Indiana, which has
Attica is part of Logan Township, Fountain County, Indiana, United States.
Attica is part of Fountain County, Indiana, United States and has a total area
Auburn is part of Lee County, Alabama, United States, where Asian Americans
Auburn is part of Pierce County, Washington, United States and has a total area
Washington, D.C. is the capital of the United States, where Auburn is
Auburn is part of King County, Washington, United States, where the capital is Washington
The population density of Austin, Texas is 1296.65 inhabitants per sq km
Antioch is part of Contra Costa County, which is part of the San Francisco Bay area
Indianapolis is the capital of Indiana, which is part of Adams Township, Madison
Indianapolis is the capital of Indiana, which is part of Lafayette Township, 
Washington, D.C. is the capital of the United States, where Native American
Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States, where the capital is
Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States, where Americans are
Akron is part of Summit County, Ohio, United States, where Asian American
English is the language of the United States, where Asian Americans are an ethnic group
The United States House of Representatives is led by the United States House of Representatives
Tim Brooke-Taylor starred in Bananaman, which was created by Steve Bright
The comic character Bolt, also known as Larry Bolatinsky, was created by
Duncan Rouleau is a American who is the creator of the film Big Hero 6
Duncan Rouleau is a American who is the creator of the film Big Hero 6
Duncan Rouleau is a American who is the creator of the film Big Hero 6
Ajoblanco is from Andalusia, Spain. The main ingredients are bread, almonds
Ajoblanco, also known as Ajo blanco, is from the Andalusia region of Spain.
The main ingredients of Arem-arem are compressed rice cooked in banana
Arem-arem is a main course in Indonesia, but more specific to Java.
The main ingredients of Arrabbiata sauce are Tomatoes, red chili, gar
The main ingredients of Arròs negre are white rice, cuttlefish or
The main ingredients of Arròs negre are white rice, cuttlefish or
Arros negre is a dish from the Valencian Community of Spain. The main 
Asam pedas, also known as Asam padeh, is a dish from
Asam pedas is a food found in Malaysia, where the Minangkabau people
Bacon Explosion is a dish from the Kansas City metropolitan area of the United
The Bacon Explosion comes from the United States where Paul Ryan is a leader
The bacon sandwich is a variation of the BLT and comes from the
The bacon sandwich contains brown sauce and is a variation of BLT
The main ingredients of a bacon sandwich are bread and bacon, with
The main ingredients of Baked Alaska are meringue, ice cream, s
The main ingredients of Baked Alaska are meringue, ice cream, s
Frangipane is an ingredient in Bakewell tart which is a variation of Bake
Bakewell pudding is a dessert from the Derbyshire Dales region of Derby
Bakewell pudding is a variation of Bakewell tart which is a 
The main ingredients of Bandeja paisa are red beans, pork belly, white
The main ingredients of Batagor are fried fish dumpling with tofu and vegetable
Batagor is a dish from Indonesia and is a variation of Siomay and
The main ingredients of Beef kway teow are Kway Teow, beef
Beef kway teow, beef tender loin, gula Melaka, slice
The main ingredients of Beef kway teow are Kway Teow, beef
The main ingredients of Bhajji are gram flour and vegetables. It is also
Bhajji comes from the Karnataka region of India where the leader is Vajubhai
Bhajji comes from the Karnataka region of India where the leaders are Sumitra Maha
Bhajji comes from the Karnataka region of India where the leader is T S Tha
Binignit is a dish from the Visayas region of the Philippines. The main 
The main ingredients of Bionico are chopped fruits, sour cream, condensed milk
Bionico is a dessert from Mexico, where the leader is Enrique Pena Nieto
Jusuf Kalla is a leader in Indonesia, where the language is Indonesian and the
The leader of Italy is Laura Boldrini and the capital is Rome. Amatriciana sauce
Pietro Grasso and Sergio Mattarella are leaders in Italy where the capital is Rome
The Banyumasan people are an ethnic group in Java where Ayam penyet is
Halimah Yacob is the leader of Java where the Banyumasan people are an 
The Zamboangans and Chinese Filipino are ethnic groups in the Philippines, where
The currency of Spain is the Euro and the leader is Felipe VI of Spain. The
The 1955 Dodge has a V8 engine and a wheelbase of 120.0 
The 1955 Dodge and the DeSoto Custom are related to the Chrysler Newport
The AIDAluna is powered by Caterpillar Inc. and its maiden voyage was on
The AIDAstella is owned by Costa Crociere and is 253260.0 millimetres long
The AIDAstella is owned by Costa Crociere and operated by AIDA Cruise Line
The AIDAstella, built by Meyer Werft, is 253260.0 millimetres in
The ALCO RS-3 was built by the American Locomotive Company between May 1950 and
The AMC Matador, also known as American Motors Matador, is assembled in
The AMC Matador, also known as American Motors Matador, is assembled in
The AMC Matador, also known as VAM Classic, is assembled in Port
The AMC Matador, also known as VAM Classic, is assembled in Tham
The Abarth 1000 GT Coupe has a straight four engine and a wheelbase of
The Acura TLX is a luxury vehicle which is assembled at the Mary
The icebreaker Aleksey Chirikov was built at the Arctech Helsinki Shipyard
The icebreaker Aleksey Chirikov was built at the Arctech Helsinki Shipyard
The icebreaker Aleksey Chirikov was built in Helsinki, Finland. It has
The icebreaker Aleksey Chirikov was built in Helsinki, Finland, where
The Alfa Romeo 164 is assembled in Italy and is related to the Saab 9000
The Alfa Romeo 164 is related to the Fiat Croma and the Lancia 
The AMC Matador was manufactured by American Motors, which was succeeded by Eagle
The American submarine NR-1 was launched on January 25, 1969 and has a top
The Antares rocket was manufactured by the Yuzhnoye Design Office and was launch
The Aston Martin V8 is related to the Aston Martin DBS and the A
The Audi A1 is assembled in Audi Brussels and has a 1.2 litre engine
The Audi A1 is manufactured by Audi, which was founded by August Horch
The AIDAluna is owned by AIDA Cruises which was founded in California
Douglas R Oberhelman is a key person at Caterpillar Inc. which was found
The Delta II is from the United States and was launched at the Vandenberg AFB Space
General Dynamics Electric Boat is located in Groton, Connecticut and is the parent company
The A-Rosa Luna was built by Neptun Werft who is located in Rostock
The ALV X-1 originated from the United States where White Americans are an 
The 11th Mississippi Infantry Monument is located in Gettysburg, Adams County,
The 11th Mississippi Infantry Monument is categorised as a contributing property and
The Baku Turkish Martyrs' Memorial is dedicated to the Ottoman Army
The Baku Turkish Martyrs' Memorial is located in Azerbaijan, where
The Baku Turkish Martyrs' Memorial is dedicated to the Ottoman Army
The Baku Turkish Martyrs' Memorial is dedicated to the Ottoman Army
Aaron S Daggett was born in Maine and fought in the American Civil War
Aaron S Daggett was born in Maine and fought in the Battle of the
Ab Klink was born in Stellendam and worked as a member of the House of
Miri, Malaysia is the birthplace of Abdul Taib Mahmud, who resides in
Abdul Taib Mahmud was born in the Kingdom of Sarawak and resides in De
Adenan Satem was born in the Japanese Occupation of British Borneo and
Adenan Satem was born in the Japanese Occupation of British Borneo and
Abel Caballero was born in Spain and was in office while Felipe Gonzalez was Prime Minister
Abel Caballero was born in Galicia (Spain) and was a member of the Spanish
Abel Caballero was born in Ponteareas, Spain, Spain. He was a member of
Abner W. Sibal was born in Ridgewood, Queens and was a member of
Abraham A Ribicoff was born in the United States and died in New York City.
Adam Holloway was born in Faversham Kent, England and served in the
Adam Koc fought in the Polish–Soviet War, where Joseph Stalin was a
Adam Koc fought in the Polish–Soviet War, where Joseph Stalin was a
Adam Koc fought in the Polish–Soviet War, where Leon Trotsky was 
Adam Koc was born in Congress Poland and fought in the Polish–Soviet War which
Adonis Georgiadis was born in Athens, Greece and worked at the Ministry of
Adonis Georgiadis was a member of the New Democracy Party in Greece 
Airey Neave, who was born in Knightsbridge, fought in the Battle of
Airey Neave, who was born in Knightsbridge, fought in World War II
Albert B White was born on 22nd September 1856 and died in Parkersburg, West
Albert Jennings Fountain was born in Staten Island, New York and died in Dona
Rear Admiral Alberto Teisaire was born in Mendoza, Argentina on 20 May 1891
Alfons Gorbach was born in Imst, Austria-Hungary and died in Styria
Alfons Gorbach was born in the state of Tyrol, Austria-Hungary and died
Alfred N. Phillips was born in Connecticut and served in the United States 
Allan Shivers was born in Lufkin, Texas and was a Governor of
Alvah Sabin is a member of the Whig Party in the United States, which
Alvah Sabin represented Vermont's 3rd Congressional District and died in Sy
Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States where Abraham A Ribic
Associazione Calcio ChievoVerona S.r.l. is the full name of A
Rolando Maran was born in Italy and plays for Unione Triestina 2012 S
The manager of AC Lumezzane is Michele Marcolini who was born in Italy. He
The A.E Dimitra Efxeinoupolis club is located in Greece where
Associazione Sportiva Gubbio 1910 Srl is the full name of A.S
The full name of A.S. Gubbio 1910 is Associazione Sportiva Gubbi
Livorno Calcio S.p.A. is the full name of Livorno Calcio
Associazione Sportiva Roma S.p.A. is the full name of A.S
AZAL PFK play in the Azerbaijan Premier League, where Qarabag FK are the
Qarabag FK is the champions of the Azerbaijan Premier League which has 3500 members and
The manager of AZ Alkmaar is John van den Brom who plays for AFC Ajax
Agremiação Sportiva Arapiraquense play in the Campeonato Brasileiro Série
Agremiação Sportiva Arapiraquense play in the Campeonato Brasileiro Série
The full name of Akron Metro Futbol Club Summit Assault is "Akron Metro Futbol
Akron Summit Assault's ground is in Akron, Ohio, United States
The ground of A.S. Gubbio 1910 is located in Italy where the
The ground of A.S. Gubbio 1910 is located in Italy, where
The full name of Associazione Sportiva Roma S.p.A. is Associazione S
The dean of the Accademia di Architettura di Mendrisio is Mario Botta
The Accademia di Architettura di Mendrisio was established in 1996 and has 600
The Dean of the Accademia di Architettura di Mendrisio was Mario Botta
The Acharya Institute of Technology was given the Technical Campus status by the All India Council
The Acharya Institute of Technology is located in Soldevanahalli, Acharya Dr. Sar
The Acharya Institute of Technology was established in 2000 and is affiliated with Visves
The 1 Decembrie 1918 University is located in Romania, where the capital is Bucharest
The School of Business and Social Sciences at the Aarhus University is affiliated with the European
The School of Business and Social Sciences at the Aarhus University was established in 1928 and has
1634: The Bavarian Crisis was preceded by 1634: The Baltic War
1634: The Ram Rebellion was written by Virginia DeMarce and has 512 pages
The AIDS journal is published by Lippincott Williams & Wilkins in the United Kingdom
A Fortress of Grey Ice was written by J.V. Jones and is available in
A Long Long Way was published by Viking Press in Ireland and was preceded by Annie
A Severed Wasp is published in print and has the OCLC number 8805735 and
A Severed Wasp is from the United States where African Americans are an ethnic
A Severed Wasp has 388 pages and OCLC number 8805735 and ISBN number 0-374
A Wizard of Mars was written by Diane Duane and is available in hardcover
The journal Addiction (journal) has the abbreviation of "Addiction" and the
The Administrative Science Quarterly is published by Cornell University in Ithaca, New
Alcatraz Versus the Evil Librarians is from the United States, where the capital
The American Journal of Mathematics, abbreviated to Am. J. Math., is
The American Journal of Mathematics, abbreviated to Am. J. Math., was
A Loyal Character Dancer is published by Soho Press in the United States, 
A Severed Wasp comes from the United States, where English is spoken,
The book Alcatraz Versus the Evil Librarians comes from the United States where
The AIDS journal is published by Lippincott Williams & Wilkins in the United Kingdom
A Fortress of Grey Ice comes from the United States, where English is spoken
A Fortress of Grey Ice comes from the United States, where English is spoken
A Severed Wasp comes from the United States where Barack Obama is the leader
Abilene Regional Airport serves the city of Abilene, Jones County, Texas,
Abilene Regional Airport serves the city of Abilene, Texas and is 546 
Adolfo Suárez Madrid-Barajas Airport is located in Madrid and is operat
The ICAO Location Identifier of Agra Airport is VIAG and it is located in 
Agra Airport is located in Uttar Pradesh which is part of Awadh and Bundel
Al Asad airbase is operated by the United States Air Force which fought in
Al Asad airbase is operated by the United States Air Force which fought in
Al Asad airbase is operated by the United States Air Force which fought in
Al Asad airbase is operated by the United States Air Force which fought in
The Pakistan Civil Aviation Authority is the operating organisation for Allama Iqbal International Airport
The Pakistan Civil Aviation Authority is the operating organisation for Allama Iqbal International Airport
Andrews County Airport serves the city of Andrews, Texas and is 973.0 above se
Andrews County Airport is located in Texas, United States, where the largest city
Andrews County Airport is located in Texas, where the largest city is Houston and
Angola International Airport is located in Ícolo e Bengo, Luanda Province,
Angola International Airport is located in Ícolo e Bengo, Luanda Province,
Antwerp International Airport serves the city of Antwerp and is operated by the Flemish
Appleton International Airport is located in Greenville, Wisconsin and serves Appleton, Wisconsin
Appleton International Airport is located in Greenville, Wisconsin (part of Clayton Winne
Ardmore Airport (New Zealand) is operated by the Civil Aviation Authority of New
Ashgabat International Airport is operated by Turkmenistan Airlines and is 211 metres above se
The Port Authority of New York and New Jersey is the operating organisation for Atlantic City International
Antwerp International Airport serves the city of Antwerp which is located in Belgium.
Atlantic City International Airport is located in Egg Harbor Township, Atlantic County, New Jersey,
Adolfo Suárez Madrid-Barajas Airport is located in Madrid, part of
Aaron Bertram plays Ska punk which originated from punk rock. He is 
Aaron Deer is a solo singer who is from Indiana, United States. He
Aaron Turner is a Black metal musician who plays electric guitar for Mamiffer and
Aaron Turner plays electric guitar for Twilight and Greymachine bands. Death metal is
Aaron Turner was born in Massachusetts and started performing in 1995. He is a
Abradab began his career in 1994 and started performing in Katowice, Katowice
The solo singer Ace Wilder was born on 23rd July 1982 in Sweden.
Agustin Barboza was born in Asuncion, Paraguay, where the leader is Juan
Ahmet Ertegun died in the United States where African Americans are an 
Ahmet Ertegun was born in 1923 in Washington, D.C., United States
Alan Frew is a solo singer who performs rock music which originated from
The solo singer Alan Frew was born in Coatbridge, Newmarket, Ontario,
The musical genre of Alex Day is Electronic music and he was born in London Borough of Have
Alfred Garth Jones was born in Manchester, which is led by the Labour Party
Alfredo Zitarrosa is a solo singer and is associated with Ciro
Alison O'Donnell, who started performing in 1963, is associated with
Anders Osborne started performing in 1989 and is associated with Billy Iuso and
Anders Osborne is a performer of rock music which is associated with Johnny
Andra is a solo singer who was born in Romania in 1986. Andra is a
Andra is a solo singer who was born in Campia Turzii in 1986. Andra
Trance musician Andrew Rayel was born in Chisinau, Moldova and began his
The musician Andrew White began his career in 2003 and is associated with the musical artist
The musical genre of Christian Burns is house music and he is associated with the following
Allen Forrest was born on the 4th of February 1981 and performs hip hop music
Agustin Barboza was born in Asuncion, Paraguay, where Spanish is spok
Agustin Barboza was born in Paraguay and died in Asuncion (part of Gran
Bhangra is a fusion genre of rock music which has its stylistic origins
The electric guitarist Aaron Turner plays electric guitar for Twilight and House of Low Culture
Alfredo Zitarrosa died in Montevideo, Uruguay, where Spanish is
Alfredo Zitarrosa died in Montevideo, Uruguay, where Daniel Martinez is
Alan Bean was a test pilot who was born in Wheeler, Texas. He was 
Alan Shepard was born in New Hampshire on 18 November 1923. He graduated from
Alan Shepard was born in New Hampshire and graduated from NWC in 1957 with
Alan Shepard was born in New Hampshire and served as a crew member of
Alfred Worden was a backup pilot of Apollo 12 which was operated by
Alan Shepard was born in New Hampshire on 18 November 1923. He was awarded the
Elliot See was born in Dallas and attended the University of Texas at Austin which is
Elliot See was born in Dallas (TSP) and attended the University of Texas at Austin
Elliot See, who was born in Dallas, graduated from the University of Texas at
Elliot See, who was born in Dallas, graduated from the University of Texas at
William Anders retired on September 1st 1969. He was a crew member of Apollo
Akeem Dent's debut team was the Atlanta Falcons who are based in
Al Kharaitiyat SC play in the Qatar Stars League and is managed by Amar O
Aleksandr Chumakov died in Russia, where the leader is Valentina Matviyenko
Aleksandr Prudnikov plays for FC Amkar Perm and FC Terek Grozny youth
Alessio Romagnoli plays for U.C. Sampdoria and is a member of
Alessio Romagnoli is a member of the Italian national under 17 football team and plays
Aleksandr Prudnikov plays for FC Dynamo Moscow and FC Terek Grozny youth
Akeem Adams plays for United Petrotrin F.C. whose chairman is
Akeem Ayers made his debut for the Tennessee Titans, who play in the
20 Fenchurch Street is located in the United Kingdom, where the capital is London and
250 Delaware Avenue is located in Buffalo, New York and has 12 floors and
300 North LaSalle is located in Chicago, DuPage County, Illinois, United States.
3Arena is located in Dublin, Leinster, Republic of Ireland and is owned
The architectural style of Adisham Hall is Tudor and Jacabian and it was 
Sri Lanka's capital is Sri Jayawardenepura Kotte and the currency is the
Adisham Hall is located in Haputale, Sri Lanka. The leader of Sri Lanka
The Akita Museum of Art is located in Akita, Akita, Akita Prefecture
Amdavad ni Gufa is located in Ahmedabad, Ahmedabad, Gujarat, India
Amdavad ni Gufa is located in Ahmedabad, Gujarat, India. The leader
Ampara Hospital has 476 beds and is located in the Eastern Province, Sri Lanka,
The Asilomar Conference Grounds was designed by Julia Morgan, who was born in California
The Asilomar Conference Grounds was designed by Julia Morgan, who was born in California
Asilomar Conference Grounds are located in Pacific Grove, California and were constructed in
The Asser Levy Public Baths were constructed in 1904 and were added to the
The Asser Levy Public Baths are located in New York City, New York City
John Madin was born in Birmingham, which is governed by the Birmingham City Council (
The Addis Ababa Stadium is located in Addis Ababa, Ethiopia. The
The English language is spoken in the United States, where the leader is the President and
The English language is spoken in the United States, where Joe Biden is the leader
(66063) 1998 RO1, formerly known as 1999 SN5, has an
The celestial body known as (66391) 1999 KW4 has an escape velocity
101 Helena was discovered on August 15th, 1868 and was discovered by James
101 Helena was discovered by James Craig Watson, who was born in Canada, and
1036 Ganymed was discovered by Walter Baade who was born in the German 
1036 Ganymed was discovered by Walter Baade who was born in the German 
107 Camilla was discovered by F Vilas and has an orbital period of 2368.05
The discoverer of 107 Camilla was N.R. Pogson who was born in
1089 Tama, formerly known as A919 HA; 1927 WB, has an
The celestial body known as 1097 Vicia has an escape velocity of 0.0112
The celestial body known as 10 Hygiea has an escape velocity of 
Abilene, Texas is located 524.0 above sea level and has a total
Abilene is part of Texas, United States, where the largest city is Houston
The English language is spoken in the United States, where Americans are an ethnic
The population density of Albuquerque, New Mexico is 1142.3 inhabitants per sq
The United States House of Representatives is located at the United States Capitol, 
Anderson is part of Indiana, United States, where the capital is Indianapolis. Anderson is
The population density of Anderson, Indiana is 523.9 inhabitants per square kilometre and
Antioch is part of Contra Costa County, which is part of the San Francisco Bay area
Attica is part of Fountain County, Indiana, United States, where the capital is
Auburn is part of Lee County, Alabama, United States, where the capital is
Auburn is part of Lee County, Alabama, United States, where African Americans
Austin is part of Williamson County, Texas, where the largest city is Round Rock
Austin is part of Williamson County, Texas, where the largest city is Houston and
Alexandria is part of Madison County, Indiana, United States. The capital of Indiana is
Arlington is part of Tarrant County, Texas, where the largest city is Houston
Arlington is part of Tarrant County, Texas, where the largest city is Fort
Austin is the capital of Texas, where Houston is the largest city and the capital is
Albany is part of Dougherty County, Georgia, in the United States, where
Washington, D.C. is the capital of the United States, where Americans are
Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States, where the capital is
African Americans are an ethnic group in the United States, where the leader is the
The English language is spoken in the United States, where Asian Americans are an 
The English language is spoken in the United States, where Asian Americans are an 
Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States which is the location of
The English language is spoken in the United States, where Barack Obama is the leader
Native Americans are an ethnic group in the United States, where English is the
The leader of the United States is the President and Asian Americans are an ethnic group in
Auburn is part of King County, Washington, United States, where the largest city
Tim Brooke-Taylor starred in Bananaman which was created by John Geering
Baymax is a character in Big Hero 6 which stars Scott Adsit. Baymax
Ajoblanco, also known as Ajo blanco, is from the Andalusia region of Spain.
The main ingredients of Amatriciana sauce are Tomatoes, guanciale,
Arem-arem is a Javanese dish from Indonesia which is led by Jok
Arrabbiata sauce comes from Italy where the capital is Rome and Italians are
Arros negre is from the Valencian Community which is led by Ximo Puig
Asam pedas is a food found in the Malay Peninsula of Malaysia, where
Arifin Zakaria is the leader of Malaysia which is the location of Asam pedas
The main ingredients of Ayam penyet are "squeezed" or "smashed
The main ingredients of Ayam penyet are "squeezed" or "smashed
The main ingredients of Ayam penyet are fried chicken and fried chicken
Bacon Explosion comes from the United States where Barack Obama is the leader and
The Bacon Explosion comes from the United States where Joe Biden is a
Baked Alaska is from France which is led by Carrie Lam and Gerard Lar
Bandeja paisa is a Colombian dish from the Paisa region. It contains lemon
Claude Bartolone and Claude Bartolone are leaders in France where the language is French
Barny cakes are created by Mondelez International, which was founded in Chicago
Bhajji comes from the Karnataka region of India, where the leaders are T.
Binignit is a dessert from the Visayas region of the Philippines. The main 
Enrique Pena Nieto is the leader of Mexico, where Spanish is spoken and
Bionico is a dessert from Mexico where the leader is Silvano Aureoles Con
Bionico is a dessert from Guadalajara, Mexico, where Silvano Aureoles
Joko Widodo is the leader of Indonesia, where Indonesian language is spoken and
Joko Widodo and Jusuf Kalla are leaders in Indonesia, where the capital is Jakarta
Pietro Grasso and Laura Boldrini are leaders in Italy, where the capital is Rome
Halimah Yacob is the leader of Singapore where the Banyumasan people are an 
The Banyumasan people are an ethnic group in Java where Standard Chinese is spoken
The Ilocano people and Igorot people are ethnic groups in the Philippines, 
Tony Tan and Halimah Yacob are leaders in Singapore, where English is spoken
Susana Diaz is the leader of Spain which is led by Felipe VI of Spain
Felipe VI of Spain is the leader of Spain where the Spanish language is spoken
The AIDAstella, built by Meyer Werft, is 253260.0 millimetres long
The ALCO RS-3 was built by the American Locomotive Company between May 1950 and
The AMC Matador, also known as American Motors Matador, is assembled in
The Alhambra is 63800.0 millimetres long and is owned by the P&O company
The Antares rocket was manufactured by the Yuzhnoye Design Office and was launch
The Antares rocket was manufactured by the Yuzhnoye Design Office and was launch
The Ariane 5 was manufactured by Airbus Defence and Space and launched at the
The Ariane 5 was manufactured by the European Space Agency and launched at the ELA
The Aston Martin Virage and the Aston Martin DBS are related means of
The Atlas II originates from the United States and was launched at the Vandenberg Air Force
The Audi A1 is assembled in Brussels, Belgium and has a 1.2 litre
Douglas R Oberhelman is a key person in Caterpillar Inc. which was found
The AIDAstella, built by Meyer Werft, is owned by Costa Crociere
The Delta II was launched at the Cape Canaveral Air Force Station at the Mid-Atlantic
The Delta II was launched at the Vandenberg Air Force Base at the Mid-Atlantic Regional
The A-Rosa Luna was built by Neptun Werft who is located in Rostock
The builder of the A-Rosa Luna is Neptun Werft, located in Rostock
The Minotaur V rocket was launched at the Mid-Atlantic Regional Spaceport Launch Pad
The ALV X-1 originated from the United States where White Americans are an 
The 11th Mississippi Infantry Monument is located in Gettysburg, Adams County,
The leader of Azerbaijan is Prime Minister Artur Rasizade and the legislature is the National
The Baku Turkish Martyrs' Memorial is dedicated to the Ottoman Army
The Baku Turkish Martyrs' Memorial is dedicated to the Ottoman Army
The Baku Turkish Martyrs' Memorial is dedicated to the Ottoman Army
Abdul Taib Mahmud was born in the Kingdom of Sarawak and resides in De
Abdulsalami Abubakar, who was in the Nigerian Army, was in office 
American Abraham A Ribicoff was born in Connecticut and died in New York City.
American Abraham A Ribicoff was married to Casey Ribicoff and died in
Adam Holloway was born in Kent and worked as a Member of Parliament
Agnes Kant is a national of the Netherlands which is led by Mark Rutte and
Agnes Kant is a national of the Netherlands which is led by Mark Rutte and
Agnes Kant is a national of the Netherlands which is led by Mark Rutte and
Albert B White was born in Marietta, Ohio and died in Parkersburg, West
Alberto Teisaire was a national of Argentina, whose leader is Gabriela Michetti
Alberto Teisaire was a national of Argentina, whose leader is Horacio Rodríguez L
Alberto Teisaire was born in Mendoza, Argentina on 20 May 1891 and was a
Alvah Sabin was a member of Vermont's 3rd Congressional District which
Alvah Sabin was born in Georgia, Vermont where the largest city is Burlington
Alvah Sabin, who was a member of the Whig Party in the United States,
Alvah Sabin was a member of the Whig Party in the United States, which
Antonis Samaras was born in Athens and was in office while Konstantinos Mitsotak
Doris Bures is the leader of Austria, where Austrian German is the language.
Stellendam is the birthplace of Ab Klink, who is a member of the Christian
The manager of A.F.C. Blackpool is Stuart Parker who plays for
The manager of AEK Athens FC is Gus Poyet, who plays for Real Zaragoza
Agremiação Sportiva Arapiraquense play in the Campeonato Brasileiro Série
Vila Nova Futebol Clube are the champions of Campeonato Brasileiro Série C
Agremiação Sportiva Arapiraquense play in the Campeonato Brasileiro Série
The dean of the Accademia di Architettura di Mendrisio is Mario Botta
The Accademia di Architettura di Mendrisio was established in 1996 in Ticino
The Acharya Institute of Technology is affiliated with the Visvesvaraya Technological University
The Acharya Institute of Technology is located in Soldevanahalli, Acharya Dr. Sar
The Acharya Institute of Technology is located in the city of Bangalore, Karnataka, 
The 1 Decembrie 1918 University is located in Alba Iulia, Romania, where the
The School of Business and Social Sciences at the Aarhus University is affiliated with the European
A Long Long Way is published by Faber and Faber which is located in
The book A Long Long Way was preceded by Annie Dunne and The Secret Scripture
The Violet Keystone and Aenir are followed by the novel Into Battle, which
Cornell University is the publisher of Administrative Science Quarterly and is affiliated with
Cornell University is affiliated with the Association of Public and Land grant Universities which
Alcatraz Versus the Evil Librarians is from the United States where Barack Obama
A Severed Wasp comes from the United States, where English is spoken,
The book Alcatraz Versus the Evil Librarians comes from the United States where
The English language is spoken in the United Kingdom where David Cameron and Elizabeth II are
The AIDS journal is published by Lippincott Williams & Wilkins, which is
A Severed Wasp is from the United States where Barack Obama is the leader and
A Severed Wasp comes from the United States where Barack Obama is the leader
Alan Bean was born in Wheeler, Texas, United States. He was a crew
Alan Shepard was born in New Hampshire on 18 November 1923. He graduated from
Alan Shepard was born in New Hampshire on 18 November 1923. He graduated from
Alan Shepard was a crew member of Apollo 14 which was operated by NASA
Alan Shepard was born in New Hampshire and was awarded the American Defense Service 
Edwin E. Aldrin Jr. is a fighter pilot who was born in Glen
Buzz Aldrin was born in Glen Ridge, New Jersey on January 20th, 1930.
Buzz Aldrin was a fighter pilot who graduated from MIT with a Sc
Elliot See was a US national who was born in Dallas and died in St Louis
Elliot See was born in Dallas on 23rd July 1927 and died in St Louis
William Anders was born in British Hong Kong on 17 October 1933. He graduated
Pietro Canonica is the designer of the bronze Ataturk Monument in İzmir, Turkey
The Baku Turkish Martyrs' Memorial is dedicated to the Ottoman Army
The 14th New Jersey Volunteer Infantry Monument is located in the Monocacy National
The Monocacy National Battlefield is located in Frederick County, Maryland, United
The Accademia di Architettura di Mendrisio was established in 1996 in Ticino
The Acharya Institute of Technology is located in Soldevanahalli, Acharya Dr. Sar
The Acharya Institute of Technology was established in 2000 and is affiliated with Visves
The Acharya Institute of Technology was given the Technical Campus status by the All India Council
The Acharya Institute of Technology was given the Technical Campus status by the All India Council
The 1 Decembrie 1918 University is located in Romania, where the capital is Bucharest
The School of Business and Social Sciences at the Aarhus University is located in Aarhus,
The School of Business and Social Sciences at the Aarhus University is located in Aarhus,
Alan Bean was a test pilot who was born in Wheeler, Texas on March 15th
Alan Bean was born in Wheeler, Texas and graduated from UT Austin in 1955 with
Alan Shepard was born in New Hampshire on 18 November 1923. He graduated from
Alan Shepard was born in New Hampshire on 18 November 1923. He graduated from
Alan Shepard was born in New Hampshire on 18 November 1923. He was a test
Buzz Aldrin is a US national who was born in Glen Ridge, New Jersey. He
Buzz Aldrin was born in Glen Ridge, Essex County, New Jersey, United States.
Buzz Aldrin was born in Glen Ridge, New Jersey on January 20th, 1930.
Buzz Aldrin was born in Glen Ridge, New Jersey and graduated from MIT with 
Elliot See was born in Dallas on July 23rd, 1927. He graduated
Elliot See was born on the 23rd of July 1927 in Dallas, Texas. He
William Anders was born in British Hong Kong on 17 October 1933. He graduated
The 11th Mississippi Infantry Monument is located in Gettysburg, Adams County,
Pietro Canonica is the designer of the bronze Ataturk Monument in İzmir, Turkey
The Baku Turkish Martyrs' Memorial is dedicated to the Ottoman Army
The Acharya Institute of Technology is located in Soldevanahalli, Acharya Dr. Sar
The Acharya Institute of Technology is located in Soldevanahalli, Acharya Dr. Sar
The Acharya Institute of Technology is located in Soldevanahalli, Acharya Dr. Sar
The Acharya Institute of Technology was established in 2000 and is affiliated with the Vis
The AWH Engineering College is located in Kuttikkattoor, Kerala, India
The 1 Decembrie 1918 University is located in Alba Iulia, Romania, where the
The Acharya Institute of Technology is located in Soldevanahalli, Acharya Dr. Sar